Have any other of you bloggers brewed a sorghum malt beer? I'd be interested in some feedback.
These paper jams are caused by some emotional impulse, some condition of the heart.
Looks like the weather will be perfect
We had an incredible time during the shoot. The producers and director are hilarious. They were mocking me for walking heavily and loudly in my winter boots, and every time I walked down the stairs they all lined up and yelled “Oh my God, it’s coming… Godzilla!!”
What makes Steve's book different is the clarity with which he draws together the threads of Trinitarian debates from the 4th Century to the time of the Reformation. As Steve shows what he calls 'The Harvest of Patristic Trinitarianism', pp. 144-46, stands for the Medieval and Reformation period scholars also. For this summary alone the book is worth having.
Los Angeles, San Francisco and New York are real cities to me. They aren't just filled with landmarks, but with supermarkets, libraries, and people. Rome and Florence, where I've been three times over many years (and, maybe equally important, hundreds, if not thousands, of times through books and art classes), are like a collection of snapshots.
- Every embroidery technique and skill is welcome - please don't hesitate to contact me if you are interested!!
Please tell this idiot what a Twitter is??!!!
I feel like I don’t have that friend in my life where I can just hang out with, talk to about nothing, and just be myself.
And it took me two weeks of intense and exhausting work to suddenly have an epiphany of what my book is about. I had thought about all kinds of different themes - truth, love, validation, hope, etc. But then today it hit me, my book is about FREEDOM! It's about being free from the prison of abuse, the prison of the aftermath of abuse, which can last a lifetime. And only you can make the choice of breaking free of that prison, to release the shame by speaking your truth. I'm beginning to realize that writing this book, may just open up a prison for me too.
Cankerworms are extremely destructive and can completely strip a tree in a day or two. I didn’t do any research for this fact. I looked no further than my backyard. They completely stripped two of our maples in less than twenty-four hours, and did untold damage in the woods at the back of our yard. It happened while H was recuperating from the surgery. He couldn’t spray them. He could never have sprayed all the trees in the back anyway, but he’s convinced they mocked him as they chewed away with no inhibitions. This, of course, was only in his mind. I think.
Spahn finished his warm-ups. He’d have to face Hank Bauer, owner of that solo homer, and Mickey Mantle, owner of 42 homers, in the 10th. But, first, Gil McDougald, Yankees middle infielder for all of the 1950’s, stepped to the plate.
Invest in the Future of Your Home With Hardiplank Siding
I have, however, been struck by lightning. I was in a mountain meadow with some friends. It stopped my heart. I had a near-death experience. Dying was a most incredible experience.
‘Look. You can see why.’ Arabella pointed out the long snake of a track that started at the farm hate and wound its way down between the fields and hedges towards a distant cluster of roofs and a church spire. ‘It’s terribly steep,’ she said. ‘And so long. It goes down into the Dingle. Do you see? It’s very rough down there. And then it goes over Hope Brook, up the other side and all the way down there.’
Diamond-$999
When I was a kid, Americans largely relied on the Holy Trinity of television journalism for their news: Huntley, Brinkley, and Cronkite. You could look at the footage coming out of Vietnam and make your own decisions about what was going on, but at least you saw what was really happening. When John F. Kennedy was shot, Walter Cronkite dried his eyes and presented the facts as they were known, not premature speculation.
Dies/punches: Magnolia heart swirl, Marianne Design hearts, Magnolia lovely fence
Here's what every room looked like while Brad was still trying to get the hang of the hole pro:
Which brings us back to Popeye's, the place where New Orleans is only a taste away. Sort of.
Later , the family gathered and legends were dug up and retold . A little boy ran in , his exact resemblance to his grandfather startling , while a baby determinedly crawled backwards and forwards over my lap , looking just like her mother when I first saw her , forty years ago .
The enemy was coming, wave after wave, and I was scramblin' to find some more ammo. My body was writin' checks my adrenaline could no longer cash.
K - Two bards appear and follow the character for 3d20 days, making a record of the character's exploits in song. The bards sing off-key.
These are not incurable faults, but they can put a damper on your social interactions. Some side effects on your entourage may include but are not limited to:
A business should always ask themselves, not only in the start up phase, but all the time- what do we do that's better, different, and more compelling than our competitors?
The testimony of a woman was not valid in court because women were viewed as unreliable. The woman at the well would have been considered particularly unreliable because of her lifestyle. She had even gone to the well at the worst time of day to avoid contact with other women. She was considered the lowest of the low. So what happened next was rather amazing.
"Hahaha. Derecho talaga. (Straight to the point huh.)"
Sometimes it appears that there is no place in the Lib Dems for people like myself. I suspect it has more the colour of my politics than anything else. I’ve always been resolute in my beliefs, and if people disagree I’ve always welcomed a debate. None of my political colleagues in Sutton have ever spoken to me about race equality, which can mean only one of three things: either they agree with me, or they lack the courage to speak about it to my face, or they just don’t care. As the country is so unequal when it comes to racial outcomes, as Liberals they should care.
Late Fall, Po begins to buy a Kay bass guitar from Trey Darby on a payment plan. Mooky buys a guitar and an amp. In December they begin playing with BM and The Toy in an unheated shed in BM's backyard. The inside walls are covered with old, hippy-ish paintings from kids of the previous owners of the house. The Toy uses pots, pans, a Sprite bottle, and his motorcycle helmet as a drum kit.
This is one of the Orange nominees this year, and the second of Farooki’s novels that I’ve read. The Flying Man is the story of a gambler, a man who spends the whole of his mostly charmed life evading responsibility, ducking out of commitment, and pleasing himself. Maqil (also known as Mike, Michel, Miguel etc, depending on his current location and identity) is born and raised in Pakistan, studies in the US, and thereafter travels the world making – and losing – money, either at casinos or by private bets with acquaintances. As the book opens he is living out his days in a seedy hotel in Biarritz, reflecting on his life, the wives and children he has abandoned, and what it means to have a reputation that you have to live up to – in this case, a reputation for being so unreliable that you aren’t expected to show up for even the most important of family events (engagements, funerals, that sort of thing). In a nice twist on the usual “man in later life defends less desirable characteristics, telling himself/others that it’s simply who he is and he can’t be expected to change, regardless of the pain he causes,” Maqil actually has some moments of reflecting that his reputation has become a burden: in other words that it’s not even his own fault that he is so unreliable, since he is just trying not to disrupt the received wisdom about him.
Adjectives are often useless things. It would take an infinite number of adjectives to describe any moment adequately. Without a frame of reference, they mean nothing. All adjectives are subjective things, privy only to each human being alone. Interjections are closer to accurate, being creatures of our deepest tides and desires. All I remember is what your skin felt like on mine. My skin feeling yours, and in between, us. The sense of touch gives what it takes. I felt like I could afford to be greedy because the feeling was free. The urge to speak is recent and institutionalized where the urge to touch each other is ancient and primal. It is beyond our ability to police this need. Why would we if we could?
Jonathan Lovett.
Thirty three sessions of radiation and 6 chemo, my eating habits died off and I lost 48 pounds that left me skin and bones. On August 22 radiation ended with me banging a gong into right field and on the 24th chemo was no more.
C. Matthew snipp, stanford University
Rossetti. There is a significant passage in ‘Et in Arcadia Ego’- a poem which begins “I have no wish to eat forbidden fruit” – where the strategy of Classical reference seems to encode more worldly sexual temptations :
In perfect adaptations,
The man who treats Leon.
Still positive thoughts - it's Wednesday today, which means after tomorrow I have 3 days off again and I will hopefully be back into a major stitching catch-up zone!!! Stay tuned.....
Lean muscle, we are there!
10/10
( the beauty of it brings me to tears every time )
We have a huge calling to draft and develop students who are following after Christ with all the heart, soul, mind, and body. Our students, like future NFL players, have tremendous potential to do amazing things for God, but if we as parents and youth leaders don’t harness that potential, then our students reach their full potential!
A Request: I would appreciate it very much if you would note/credit and link back here if this post inspired you to do a series or a variation of the series of your own.
I’ll be damned of my daughter ever stays with an abusive man because she might be able to “turn” him into a prince.
trying to keep up with getting ready for
So this image covers the photo topic in another way, it is unusual I let someone deter me this way, I am usually fairly forthright. Obviously not enough on this day.
Kendra from My Insanity recently hosted an ABC 1st Birthday for her son and boy did it come out super cute! (Not to mention - her son is super cute too!) Before I came across the blog post she did for the party, I had seen the cake numerous times on Pinterest! I love that feeling when you find the source of awesomeness!
I can't wait for the next Girls Night. We've decided to make this a monthly occurance so we are looking for ideas for next month!
I also just entered a contest that Justin Timberlake is hosting for his new style line called “HomeMint.” My entry is a B.B. King caricature that I created in egg tempera.
I have been working on my personal sustainability promise for just over a week now and I am surprised at how simple the change has been. Luckily the weather has been nice (by Oregon standards) and I have not been overly bombarded by rain while walking to work in the afternoon and evenings. Initially, I was a bit unsettled by walking home alone late at night, but the streets are lit enough and, while I don’t know Karate, I do know kuh-razy and I will use it. Though my ferocious tendencies often come in handy, I feel safe enough walking on well lit roads on my own. Thus far, it doesn’t seem like something that could potentially be a problem.
Multi-story looks like a very interesting site for those in shorts, offering respectable prizes, judging by professionals, low entry fee and a very comprehensive list of resources on the links page.
Unemployment… to this CRISIS by (among MANY other things) dumping 5-6
Hair1: Wasabi Pills – Hawk2 (Fantasy Faire )
even a jacquard print. You would think that this would be to busy or not work. But it is wonderful together. My husband was very moved by this when he saw it and said his mother would have been pleased. I thought about some stickles and glimmer mist, but decided against it and leave it clean. I think I made the right choice. Directions available upon request.
*I am so glad that you are back to being a mostly happy student. I was so worried about you during 2nd grade, but you have come a long way and I love seeing you eager to go to school, happy about your school work, and excited about learning again.
We wonder and smile.
Hmmm.... this is a bit tricky. I would say "one strike you're out" as a general rule. If you've submitted and your manuscript has been read and passed on (that's the euphemism for rejected :)), your work there (with that particular MS) is done and it's time to move on to another publisher.
Dumpsters at McCaskey have been painted (probably by high school art students) in unique and creative ways, turning a symbol of dirt and waste into art.
I'd have a fireplace
Teamed up with a metallic peach kohl pencil to make the natural highlights of the eye pop.
One of the most impressive and enjoyable parts of the film is how Stoller manages to find the humor not just in what is happening on screen, but in the language of film itself. Often, the funniest moments of ENGAGEMENT are the beats between the scenes: the comedy of montage, the way a scene continues far past the point of necessity – all of it. It is not enough to make each individual scene funny through its content. It must be funny in its form, as well – a violation of expectations.
To hold you to her bosom and kiss you,
"At this time? Right now? Yeah....maybe!"
Well, about a week or so upon returning to Hawaii, Joshua came home and said there is a possibility that he will be offered the position as the Chief Pilot of his current job. The thing is, that we never expected there to be a possibility for moving up in this company. We knew that the amount of money Joshua started off making would never change and that was one huge reason for us wanting so desperately to get back to the mainland. Living off our savings and having our savings dwindle very quickly was not working!!!
The original owner has some really cute photos here, so here's the link so I can find it again!
Divinity must live within herself:
~shakar96
Recipe courtesy of a package of Bob’s Red Mill Flaxseed Meal
Anyhow, long story short: it was exhausting. The teacher was Tigger...bouncy bouncy bouncy bouncy fun fun fun fun fun....and it got annoying. I mean, wow, he had a big job, keeping us entertained for a week, while we were deprived of sleep, put through an intensive 'project simulation' where NONE of us had a fucking CLUE what was going on (and of which I was 'voted' (forced) to be leader of our team) and trying to learn a lifetime's worth of project management techniques.
Dr. Feng Zhang, CABI East Asia, Beijing, China
In our modern setting the art of clubbing has changed from parties at the rich homes to becoming more open. For small fees people from any social class can enter into dark, smelly, sticky, crowded rooms, where they can dance and socialise. It is a bit unsure where the idea of socialising and clubbing fit together mainly because clubs are nothing more then dark rooms with music so loud that even if a person is yelling at the top of their lungs no one could hear it. In fact Clubs are a hot spot for all sorts of questionable acts, almost as bad as brothels. The dance floors are nothing more then primal, unglorifed, mating grounds in which one can catch many a disease. Many people leave Clubs with a feeling of self-worthlessness, and even those who do mange to wake up in a different bed inevitably have to spend money on various heath tests which often leads to negative results.
The emoticons were livid, the font was quite irate
Because of the widespread damage stress can cause, it’s important to know your own limit. But just how much stress is “too much” differs from person to person. Some people roll with the punches, while others crumble at the slightest obstacle or frustration. Some people even seem to thrive on the excitement and challenge of a high-stress lifestyle.
Ingredients for the sauce
Each component of the project, each layer, each person who creates, supports, facilitates, and helps is doing so for the benefit of our children. We are so grateful that the child is valued and cherished in our society, as our future is in their hands.
But, I did understand that if I could give them a real family, they would be more complete than if I just gave them a “blended” family. And so, I let my husband become their father.
Envision yourself hanging from the ledge. Your fingertips are sweaty and losing grip. Your knuckles turn ghostly white and you are rapidly losing strength. You see one nearby branch protruding and your sympathetic nervous system allows you one last fight-of-flight response. The branch is strong enough to hold you, but you don’t know that. All you know, is that as you fall you have just enough time to reach out and take hold of it.
Row 3: Beg dc cluster, ch 1, * skip next two ch-1 spaces, (dc, ch 1) in next two spaces, (dc, ch 1) four times in next space, (dc, ch 1) in next two spaces, skip next two spaces, (dc cluster, ch 1) twice in next space. Repeat from * across, dc cluster in last st.
Imagine you and your best friend head out West on a cross-country bike trek. Imagine that you get into a fight—the cheap SOB won’t kick in any cash—and you stop riding together. Imagine you reach Seattle, go home alone, and start college. Imagine you think your former best friend does too. Imagine he didn’t, that he was carrying more than $20,000 in cash the whole trip, and that now the FBI is looking for him. Imagine your world shifting....
You have a healthy imagination and are extremely creative, especially at harmoniously arranging the beauty already potential in the environment. These abilities can lead you into fields such as interior decorating, landscape art, and photography. But because of your strong social consciousness, you can be an effective politician, lawyer, judge, minister, teacher, healer, or environmentalist. Vocations that require self-sacrifice and have a clear positive social impact are common among 9s.
I was reminded of this recently when I saw an advertisement for Take Your Child to Work Day. The ad included a cartoon of a caveman father and son, wearing the usual leopard skin outfits and carrying spears, running away from a gigantic dinosaur. The child shouts “I should have gone gathering with mom!” The irony is, of course, if I took my kids to work, they’d probably hear me give my quarterly explanation of geological time and why the dinosaur-chasing-caveman scenario is impossible.
And Lastly the hubby really out did himself this time. For the birth of our daughter and our 10 year anniversary he surprised me with this.
Sure, often I make the treats myself, but I have fun doing it. Sometimes I even share.
Longevity
Then off to find the "PERFECT paper to go with her...Found Moxie Spring has Sprung (Perfect Posies, Nature's Gift, & Beauty in Bloom)
Source:www.punchng.com
New York men said an app won’t stop them from telling a pretty woman what’s on their mind.
On another plane, life goes on. I think a lot about my friend Mia who died and am often struck by the finality of death. I am very happy that she had the strength to get friends and family together for a Celebrate Life party last winter. That was one classy good-bye.
I will TRY to be brief, but that's a LOT to cover in one blog post! This one might be kind of long... here goes!!!!
Its so sunny and mild here in Ireland at the moment that it is time to give the lawns their first cuts of the year ! That means that stitching and knitting time is about to get drastically reduced :(
I decided to transfer values to where I had written the verbs and came up with: authenticity, integrity, joy, wisdom, intention, sustainability, abundance, acceptance, and gratitude (I liked it better as a value than as a verb).
So now I'm starting over again. After my conditional acceptance to Berkeley, which I spent 3 years obtaining at community college, was taken away- I didn't have the will to go back and retake the 2 classes that I needed. I was burnt out and had lost confidence.
Sisters in Crime has extended its We Love Libraries! grant program into 2012.
5. (I did have another query – but it might be too much??) I was wondering about Elend and Vin – they’ve also had their ups and downs this week but seem determined to work round them – can you see anything of a future for these two or is there too much history between the nobles and Skaa and too much difference and prejudice between the two?
I’ll lay low, pray high,
"Can you teach me to knit ?"
“which He wrought in the Messiah when He raised Him from the dead and seated Him at His right hand in the heavenlies, far above all rule and authority and power and mastery, and every name that is named, not only in this age but also in that which is to come. And He put all under His feet, and gave Him to be head over all, to the assembly, ” (Ephesians 1:20-22 The Scriptures 1998+)
The economy should be managed for the benefit of the nation. The other parties are enslaved to laissez-faire globalism, which means that British workers must compete against those in China and India who work for as little as a pound a day. Oriental countries such as Japan, South Korea and Singapore have managed their economies to combine private enterprise competition with the national good, and these are the models the BNP would emulate.
Those living things show me our Living God.
of you know, Dave went on to be a champion of and for juice feasting and
and Im thinking about a necklace with the pendant and the 5$ buttons and other things as Im going to use it all ..thinking...thinking.....:)
This contest was inspired by Disney’s “Great Service Fanatic” card.
After the race Kelsey picked me up from near the stadium/finish line and I got to enjoy my first trip to Mellow Mushroom for pizza. I ordered the Funky Q. Chicken Pizza which was topped with barbecue chicken, bacon, cheese and barbecue sauce.
Yeah so, I didn't update our little blog hardly as much as I wanted to, so sorry about that, but WE'RE HOME!
People may think that is too harsh and that everyone deserves a second chance, but you fuck me over and that's it. Fuck me over once, shame on me. Fuck me over twice and it sucks to be you.
Photographs by Peter Vitale to accompany text written by him for, I think, Architectural Digest. I clipped and did not note magazine, issue or date. If anyone can tell me so I can correct this, I would be grateful. Also, if anyone can identify the print on Smith's wicker chairs I would very much appreciate it. I know it was from Brunschwig et Fils.
- In Iceland it was once against the law to own a pet dog.
Our race has done more good in this word than any other yet born, and we must not die, we shall not die.
for some things
musicals I Like or Love: INTO THE WOODS. LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS. SINGIN' IN THE RAIN...these are pieces of art that generally speaking work on every level: from each character's story, to the story between the characters, to the story of the society and world in which the action takes place. plus, the songs and the movements pulse with life - the life of these characters, about whom we care, even if we care cynically. we are engaged in wanting to know what happens, and every step taken is one step further along that path.
Best Catered Chocolate - Cowgirl Cupcakes
I had the whole family dressed, camera ready, and on location in 20 minutes.
Obedient
I still use it now and then and it certainly gets more use than the Wii I also still have sitting there.
Let Me Go
He left it to the Democratic Congress. He left it to those incompetent pukes so they could screw it up. Then, he could blame them when it could no longer be blamed on Bush.
Whitman started a tradition of having his temporary residents submit their "biographies." Mercer describes it as "an archive of sociological wonders . . . a vast survey of the great drifters of the past forty years." I wonder if the best bits will be compiled into a book someday? Although Whitman's daughter now runs the store, a bit of his biography is still posted outside the store -- almost like a manifesto.
Now I will tag ---
Brian Cashman is making a rare appearance at an autograph show this weekend.
She will start rebuilding in a few weeks hopefully. If anyone is near Nashville and would like to help out with construction when we get started let me know. We'll need all the help we can get!
In the House of the Worm
When Tom fortuitously saves the city's Head Historian from a mysterious and disfigured assassin named Hester Shaw, he finds himself not rewarded for his bravery but tumbling down a chute and out of the city after her, where they must cope with one another and with privation and hardship in the Out-Country. Tom soon finds out that the world is far more complex than he realized working in the depths of the History Museum, and the authority figures he's been taught to revere have nefarious plans of their own. As he tries to catch up with his moving city, it becomes clear that he may be the only one able to save it from hurtling headlong towards danger.
Social Security and Medicare are in trouble precisely because every dollar of payroll taxes is spent: “Nothing is saved, and nothing is invested. The payroll taxes contributed by today’s workers pay the benefits of today’s retirees.” And what about the Social Security and Medicare Trust Funds? They are “are little more than IOUs the government writes to itself.”
Dinner is quiet; your spouse has had the same kind of day as you, and is not in the mood to be kind.
Don’t aim to do a lot more than your body is currently able to, simply because what is going to happen is that overtraining and straining the body can cause it to hurt all over, and these aches and pains will dissuade you from following your training day after day. It’s actually an easy task to move from couch to 5k. All you should do when you’re starting your 5k training if you’ve by no means trained before is to take every single day by itself. Just focus on what you want to do on a certain day, and don’t attempt to do less or more than that. Now, the key to practicing for 5k for those who have had no previous training is to alternate between walking and running. In case you run a little distance and then when you can’t run any more, walk a little distance until you ensure you get your wind back, then run again, you’ll discover that you can cover a great deal more ground than you would if you run without stopping. Yes, that’s all it takes to go from couch to 5k.
Looking at Baluse, I had to wonder why the Command sent two aides to defend my father and his crew. “What is your plan on defending Captain Raven and his crew?” I asked knowing that if they had a plan; it would be weak at best.
This is a war that Shaka promised his people. He said that during the time of the 8th (current) King of the Zulus, they the Zulus will rule again and that during this time they the Zulus shall take up the battle with the other tribes, particularly with the Xhosa, and that they shall kill all of them including the very last one. He said they must not allow one Xhosa to remain alive, for he will breed again.
The first chapter actually begins off the island with the character of Iris Tilford who is trying to going sober at a mission somewhere in Savannah. We learn that besides fighting the demons of alcoholism and drug abuse she is also fighting demons related to her friends’ death. She has plans to return to the island soon, to put her fears to rest. Of course if she knew what awaited her there, she might have reconsidered.
My best friend walks each year in the Susan G. Komen Race for the Cure in Baltimore, Maryland. She lost her mom to breast cancer when we were in high school, so this disease has had a huge impact on her life, as it has on the lives of many women and their daughters.
Where will transitional kindergarten be offered?
General Henry H. Shelton, USA (Ret.)
The expectations of what we as publishers & distributors of consumer goods ought to deliver are now being determined by companies like Amazon which – sustained losses year on year – are so well capitalised that they can afford the continuous software development that is now a pre-requisite of being an effective part of the supply chain. The tension between the need to reduce costs now – and the need to invest – has exacerbated publishing’s crash course for disaster, without publishers even being aware of it – so far removed are they from the reality of the customer’s experience of obtaining their products.
(My friend Erin and I have been chatting about frittatas. She can't stop making them either. She has been putting feta on top of hers. Genius. Now I am too. Check out her beautiful blog Yummy Supper. And she should have a frittata post up soon.)
(All videography by Jonathan Barkey.)
Farnham White Bines were considered the best hops in Britain and commanded the highest price:
Uncover and stir in olives, raisins, and fresh oregano. Simmer until most of the liquid is reduced, but the meat is still moist. Add salt and pepper to taste.
Tourist: ¿Dondé?
Everything is still going really well..
Kids can study at night in electrified homes. Educated kids won’t need to wade knee-deep all day in cold rice paddies. At that level there’s no righteousness in chasing the “lost paradise.” Hats off to China’s retiring technocratic generation, soon to be replaced.
Like a comic it spends very little time on back story, diving straight into the plot with the luxury of having most of their character development done on earlier episodes but this shows the characters learning to interact as a team. We learn a bit more about Hawkeye and Black Widow and we get to see how even though they are “only” highly trained humans they get to play a part in team of powerhouses like Iron Man, Hulk and Thor. In particular I’d say the surprise for me was really how right the Hulk and Banner are in this film and I’m glad that Mark Ruffalo has agreed to do more films featuring the Hulk. As Banner he is very carefully calm and quiet with a wry humour. As the Hulk we get to see him on a raging rampage but also later as the calmer powerhouse easily ripping through the enemy ranks. He also has more brutal sense of humour with some excellent scenes that really stand out and I’m not surprised the general reaction after seeing the film is a desire for more Hulk.
Tony Fernandes, Team Principal: “We head back to Europe after what has been an encouraging first four races for the team. We may not have quite bridged the gap to the midfield pack yet, but we are clearly much closer than we were this time last year, particularly on race day when we have seen clear evidence of the progress we have made.
Decent acts on the list so far worth watching:
See? Bad timing.
~Romans 6:1-2
Paper-Basic Black, Riding Hood Red, White, Pink Pirouette, Bella Rose DP, Black & White Dots Scrap
he, for whom i got a tattoo
39. Luhan once was a China-ulzzang.
6. Thunder And Lightning (Ballard) 5:09
Sleeper LPs:
The very idea that muslims must not kill women and children or damage property etc implies that these wars were offensive wars. If these wars were defensive then muslims needed to worry about their own women and children.
This was actually a very fun room to do. Cade really wanted navy walls, but I knew that that would be too dark. When I put the inspiration board together I mentioned that I was going to do a navy accent wall. I changed my mind. I ended up painting a navy rectangle almost the length of his bed to create a focal point. I painted it high enough so that one do when he actually has a bed, as apposed to a mattress on the floor, it should still be a the right height.
A year ago, a baby was born
CD: If there was one thing you’d change about yourself what would it be?
George Parker
The past few years in Texas have seen a parade of DNA exonerations: more than 40 men so far. The first exonerations were big news, but the type has grown smaller as Texans have watched a dismaying march of exonerees, their wasted years haunting the public conscience.
I like my heroes to find a romantic partner, a co-protagonist. It seems to dissipate the energy of the story if the two are always in conflict. I prefer it when they bond together in their struggle against fate (or an employee of a corporation as the personification of fate). To me, the biggest villain around is fate. What is more unfair, more murderous, more disastrous than fate?
Finally washing on the line dried. And the pleasure of putting on jeans fresh out of the tumble drier!
7) It takes a LOT of persuasion to embed the idea of constant, greater engagement across your business.
While in the food court eating, I was trying to take my mind off how nervous I was by checking facebook and my message boards on my phone. On the Spina Bifida Kids board I read a post by an expectant mom who just found out a few days ago her baby girl has SB, and she's still coming to terms with everything and learning more about her daughter's specific diagnosis. She said she was afraid of how this would affect her family and if her other children would suffer.
Waking up for Wales perhaps not? Carwyn is on record as saying that he wants decision-making powers for renewable energy developments up to 100MW to be devolved to Wales. So what about any projects that come in over the magic 100MW figure? That according to Carwyn's logic would get decided upon in London by Conservative / Lib Dem Ministers.
To brighten your days of the New Year....
I play video games too, but they feel unrewarding. I play them, beat or lose to them, and then there's no reward or penalty for doing either. At least with manga, I get a story, maybe learn something, but video games have no gain, they have no substance. Despite that, it's really easy to get pulled in, and I spent some money on a new computer that I'm waiting to ship to me so I can play games more intensive than, say, Morrowind or Alpha Centauri.
The cat’s run off, the chooks won’t lay, the old black dog went lame
Like me, you might be surprised at how often you’ll be able to use both skills together.
The Marquess of Bute was create in 1796 and the title is still in use today by a British racecar driver. Dumfries House serves as their family seat.
I said I was going to talk about my feelings. Well, here goes.. I am angry. Mad as hell actually that I have not allowed myself to be afraid, to be angry, to feel proud of the decisions that I have made to survive a disease that so many have not. Mad as hell that I have been made to feel ashamed of my experience and that talking about the importance of those self exams may actually save someone else’s life. I have decided that the reason others are uncomfortable with my story is that it keeps them from making excuses. You cannot stick your head in the ground and not take responsibility for your own body.
Now a hunted fugitive, Hays is thrown into a life he never dreamed possible--fighting to save humans everywhere from extinction. He enlists all of his training to uncover the truth that will save millions of lives--maybe even his own. James Patterson's Toys is a thriller on a hyper plane--with a hero who rivals both James Bond and Jason Bourne.
in color that will remain till the skin wears away.
06/27 – Cambridge, MA @ The Middle East
But what if I just have that much to say? I hear you arguing. Well here are a couple of tips.
The news of Bruce's death arrived with us after the Spring 2012 issue of Eagle Times went to press. The issue includes an article by Jeremy Briggs on Bruce's cutaway drawings. We will be including an obituary in our Summer issue.
Rather than analysing such simple phenomena, the ECJ finds itself jumping in at the deep end with more complex site-user interfaces: AdWords in the Google France cases and, in a year or two, eBay in L’Oréal v eBay.
Meredith Duran will leave you wanting more as Gwen and Alex are discovering each other in Wicked Becomes You. I liked the concept of the plot. I thought it was interesting to read how the nice girl gets jilted twice and her solution is to become wicked and the opposite of her old self. I also liked how Alex resisted and played the way of a big brother but his feelings were anything but brotherly.
9.Your drop your phone while you are getting in your and car do not realize it until it is too late. Yeah, your run over the phone. Fortunately, this has not happen to me but I have heard about it happening to people.
Rejuvenate and protect lips with the Organic Indulgence Lip Butter. Formulated with beeswax, shea butter, coconut oil, sunflower seed oil and vitamin E, your lips will be thanking you for the hydration and softness.
400g tin sweetened condensed milk
i wanted to cry. i tried to still blame drunk drivers in icy conditions.
Jamal places the clip board back inside the car and closes the passenger door. He walks to the rear of the car and opening the hatch back starts digging around until he finds a squat, dark brown Army box. The box has the distinct red and white medical symbol on it and says “US Army general purpose medical case.”
I would like to clarify that the brown on top of the buntlettes is not because I burned the wee fellas. It is brown sugar and cinnamon. I didn't coat the tops as evenly as I would have liked. I was a bit rushed as all the things I made for dinner last night got done cooking at exactly the same time. While the cakes don't look so spectacular they were pretty tasty in their messy cinnamon and brown sugar attire.
I'm loving that yesterday was National Chocolate Chip Cookie Day
“She’s trying to figure out how to control the inheritor of magic. That’s why she’s killing so many, one witch and one young man, eight murders now,” Ronan said.
Comments over at Statter 911 run the gamut, with some folks lambasting the pair for not being in their PPE and others praising their actions. After viewing the video, I would have to say that the risks they took were not extreme and, under the circumstances, probably appropriate.
How I will go about pursuing any of this is beyond me, but at least I can say I now have a bucket list.
The slanting light, the sound of boat waves
The cheer inside
Is it generally accepted that some people are genetically more prone to colds?
What do we do with the Ten Commandments? After all, they were given by God to be obeyed. God told Israel in Exodus 19:5 to obey His voice and to keep His covenant. But what did Jesus Christ do to the law? He fulfilled it. According to Colossians 2:14 the law was blotted out because it was nailed to the cross of Christ. So the apostle clearly states in Romans 6:14 that we are not under law but under grace. Can you take God at His word or do you have to reason with Him.
Be sure to email me your goals for the week. You will have ACC on Wednesday. Just a reminder that you do not have class this Friday or next Monday.
BCM uses a “transmedia” approach where we produce news in a variety of forms:
I asked my wise friend, Wendy the other day what should an appropriate response be to this line of questioning. She keeps me grounded when I suffer from my ‘home maker’ angst from time to time and lends an ear to my gripes. She said ‘Tell them you are investing in your family!’ That sounded important and professional, I am totally going with it!
These brands also compete with other players for share of wallet. Nearly 70% of consumers who eat out are below 35 years, Booz & Company’s Food Services Retail in India report says. They patronise the Rs 7, 000-crore organised India food services industry.
Article 149
...have champagne taste but a beer budget. I'd like to think I make it work. (Did you catch the Tim Gunn reference? That goes back to my enjoyment of reality TV).
EAST "a cultural property"
…has an amazing imagination
I'm trying to mix up the workshop topics so there's something for everyone. I'll still have more on publishing, and that 1875 forensics post, so keep coming back. And I'll mention again that Blogger is still not publishing my posts on schedule, so until they fix it (or I take the blog elsewhere), please bear with me if things show up later than usual. Much as I love you guys, getting up at 5 AM to hit "publish" isn't appealing.
I kept whispering his name, over and over, and each time, his ears lowered, his eyes softened, and his posture relaxed as a wave of contentment just seemed to flood him. I stroked his ears, rubbed his shoulders, buried my face into his scruff and hugged him.
The Morris family are still alive, though some days barely. The bugs have been rampant in our house the last few weeks, when the spewing stopped the sneezing started. I had to wonder why we even moved back to this cold, damp area of NZ. I remember struggling through winters as a kid, with asthma and croop and one heck of a fog horn cough, and now I'm subjecting my kiddos to the same thing.
Pre-Spanish occupation, woman were treated equally and respected occupation like Babaylan (leader or healer in Filipino Pagan religion) were held mostly by women. During Spanish era, society became more patriarchal, though women were still respected and revered. One would assume (and I would say, mostly true) that this is because of the influence of the Roman Catholicism brought to us by the Spanish. It was during this era when they were expected to be prim and proper, following European standards of female etiquettes. But their social roles became more limited. Females were expected to take care of the family and service their husband, nothing more or less. Government positions were male-dominated. American occupation introduced concepts like education for all (regardless of gender) and with education comes empowerment. They can become professionals and hold government position.
There was MP Cheryl Gallant who compared abortion to a beheading. Then MP Randy White said the Conservatives would overrule the courts on same sex marriage.
You just end up getting more and more removed from the world, and living deeper and deeper in your own head. People end up walking around in sort of a perpetual daze, like they never really wake up in the morning. Sometimes, someone will be telling a story, and just stop in mid-sentence and stare off into space, having to be snapped back to reality by someone poking them, having completely forgotten the last half-hour or so. People have described in to me as that you don't have the ability to concentrate on very much. If you're lucky, you'll have just enough concentration to get your job done, but after that, you just don't notice the world around you.
The good news, at last, begins with publication at (9) MicroHorror.com, for my historical crime story, Anatomy of a Crime. I have been fond of this story for a while, and I was pleased to find somewhere for it online - I nearly didn't put it into my anthology as it was unpublished at the time.
Finally, you belong here if … you believe you belong here. Even if these cliché and corny Olivet habits are true about you, you truly believe this is where you are supposed to be – not because of the rules, the homework or the dorms, but because the people at Olivet have shaped and molded you into the person you are today.
I used Wonderland cd for tag and misting ink from Sarah. Used a butterfly stencil then painted with mica paints so the gold shines in the light, then added gold ribbon with fibres to the handle and used the Alice image from the Wonderland CD as a tag.
10. Save Me
Adapted from Life Made Delicious
Now that the conference is over and I’m back home, I can tell you that I spent three nights and four days in downtown New Orleans all by myself! :0) Aren’t I a big girl? Hah! My family wasn’t very happy that I was all alone, but my husband had to work. Ah well…I survived and that’s all that matters!
Christine Blower the appointed Leader of the National Union of Teachers whose annual salary £124,483 plus allowances, plus tax-free perks and living quarters, plus a gold-plated pension tells us on a regular basis that she is a member of the Campaign for a Democratic and Fighting Union. It's not a political party, but a group of like-minded people within the union who have a view of how campaigning should be conducted. It counts within its ranks 'many' members of the Liberal Democrats.
The tweeters and the poets,
The last few months have been very work focused, I have had a huge mark load and I really wanted to work through it before my cycle began so I could remain calm. That is my focus for this cycle: ZEN!
71 min: Williamson does well to head away a Bonsingwa cross as Chelsea pile on the pressure.
The website adds: “Participants will be accompanied during the entire visit.”
I said, "yes"
My immediate reply was "Oh I was hoping you would ask me that!"
We know that the new covenant was bought by the blood of Jesus. When he shed his blood he purchased everything their new birth and their keeping and their glorification. Keeping power and authority is coming and flowing through the blood of Jesus Christ.
When all these tributes had been paid,
But he also took aim at those, mostly Democrats but a growing number of conservatives, who no longer see a clear purpose to America’s longest war and “will ask why we don’t leave immediately.”
String Quartet in C# minor Op. 131
Yes, I took this weirdo picture before I had any reason for it.
Founded in 1999, Hippocampus Press specializes in classic horror and science fiction with an emphasis on the works of H. P. Lovecraft and other pulp writers of the 1920s and 1930s. Working closely with the leading scholars in the field we offer unique, high-quality, affordable editions of these important works.
There’s more detail later about creating strategies. First, we’d like to lay out the general concepts, and get more specific in the chapter Create Social Computing Strategies on page 75.
The only downside I experienced in the installtion was the ink supply hose makes it hard to fully close the unit.
There’s plenty more at the link. I know a lot of us men are thinking what this gentleman wrote. All I can say is…go for it ladies.
Once they were off to show everyone else their new treasure grand daughter and I finished tieing up the tomatoes. She might have gotten to eat three little ones. We are starting to get several a week.
The full transcript of sentencing remarks is here:
Otherwise, I think it is a strange and incorrect thing to say.
I hope everyone has a fantastic weekend! I am still missing Barcelona and getting back into the rhythm of my regular life. Be sure to check back next week because I will be sharing pictures and details from my trip to my new favorite city.
Seriously hate it with a passion! It’s such a pointless boring way to spend your life in my eyes. I mean don’t get me wrong, sometimes it is really nice to just have no other concerns other than your own feelings and emotions. It’s nice sometimes to be able to go out, drink as much as you want, flirt your ass off and not feel bad about it in the morning; but how often do I do that anyway? Like never.
Hugo: So which BV wine is your all time favorite?
ed anche una grande semplicità.
Tuesday (all day): Taco Tuesday with 2 for $2 beef tacos, $2.50 McCoy's pints, $10 margarita pitchers & $15 Mexican beer buckets.
Stuck for writing ideas? Use the following idea as a spark for inspiration – change the point of view, create a character, situation and conflict, strike up any genre that suits and keep developing and writing!
I attached a full tank of CO2 to the new regulator, opened the valve and called it quits for the day. Inspecting the tanks the next day, I noticed I had forgotten to tighten the regulator to the tank, in the process emptying a CO2 tank in to the atmosphere, inadvertently enlarging my carbon footprint. Yep.
Oak Ridge Revival had a great DIY post I loved. She stenciled her bathroom walls--this is a great alternative to wallpaper. Have you ever had to remove wallpaper? Not fun. I love the soft, whispery white and gray walls, and it only took her a few hours!
Mikkeller Nelson Sauvin Single Hop IPA
Southwark Council has decided to sell Greenland Pier, the pontoon and linking bridge that is used by the Thames Clipper as their Rotherhithe stop, linking Rothehithe with Canary Wharf and the rest of the river between Greenwich and Embankment.
Passionate indie pop from BC from guys who went through a lot and came out of it so much stronger.
I went down, down, down and the flames went higher
Johannes then called in Makepisi male, and he was not all too far from me so I thought it would be a good send off for my guests. En route we came across fresh lion tracks. I unfortunately did not have the time to follow so called them in, and rushed of to get in a leopard sighting before my guest’s early breakfast. Makepisi was hiding in thick mopane and continued to do so, only popping out briefly before hiding back in the green foliage. It was quite tricky terrain and after a struggle to get another station in the sighting, I rushed back to
Stop. Let’s go through this bit of movie logic. Perseus is the son that Zeus refused to save. Zeus was mad because Acrisius was leading a human revolt on Olympus, so Zeus shapeshifted to look like Acrisius and nailed his wife, getting her preggers. Acrisius, despite seeing Zeus and his wife post-mating, waits until she pops out Perseus, then puts them both in a casket, walks them to the edge of a cliff, and tosses it into the ocean. Hermes is all, “Hey Zeus, wanna save your kid?” and Zeus is all, “Nope.”
and it has cost me in one way or another.
2. Did you hear about the two homosexual judges? They kept trying each other.
We are lucky today to have a guest design team member joining us for this challenge. Tammy Louise Cunliffe has been one of our favorite top three winners in the past and has an awesome blog here.
4. Then one by one, add the eggs, mixing well between each. Work the dough until it is elastic and detaches from your fingers more easily (or from the bowl of the stand mixer).
Prabhupada: “Yes, yes. Just like Krishna is guiding us, similarly, spiritual master will guide. We are being guided by Krishna, by the Bhagavad-gita. Although Krishna is not physically present, still, His book Bhagavad-gita is there. And that Bhagavad-gita is nondifferent from Krishna.”
Charlie Kaufman, Synecdoche, New York
6. Barrie & Steve
A card for daddy designed by mummy, a card for mummy, designed by daddy, a card created by a 6 year old hands, colored in for her big teenage brother, yet she hadn’t got one herself and was a bit miffed by this, so I said I would design one especially for her, and so I did.
For apetizers we had some cheeses and cold meats with fresh bread...
Now we live just around the corner from this road; one which I occasionally walked down to get home from school if I missed the bus. It's a tree lined road filled with large detached houses with beautiful gardens that I used to admire; an area I really never thought I could afford to live in.
Not true, of course.
I walk the crowded streets with my eyes behind dark lenses
Flirty tip 4 Do not use neighs when flirting, ever. Flirty tip 5 Eye contact is very important but remember to look away, otherwise, it will get creepy . So, a good tip I have for you is, if they look away and they’re not looking at you is cold to stare at them but when they look back at you, you look away so eye contact is completely avoided at all times. Wait, no.
Understanding that FATIGUE is not laziness, but a physiological symptom that can be caused by a chronic, systemic disease, such as Rheumatoid Arthritis is an important step in appreciating the many trials that RA patients face every day. Improving FATIGUE symptoms may be possible through exercise tailored for RA patients’ needs and limitations. According to the Johns Hopkins Arthritis Center, “…regular physical activity has been shown not only to improve some arthritis symptoms (e.g., fatigue, pain, mood) but also to promote general health.”(4)
4 cups frozen hashbrowns, thawed
She's on the front of a "Z Fold Card" made from Pear Pizzazz card stock. The front left was embossed using the Perfect Polka Dots Embossing Folder. The front panel is made using one of my favorite new items from the new Occasions Mini Catalog. The panel was cut using the new "Labels Collection" Framelits Die.
Many have focused on the fact that employers are now doing this and have decried the intrusion into privacy and the “big brother” overreach by government employers. But, the intended and unintended consequences for both employers and employees go far beyond the obvious and will affect:
. I really had to use a lot of glue and pressure to get the green piece to stick to the gold because it was buckled from the watered down ink. Here's my trick. After glue it down well, I flip it over onto a clean piece of paper and use a clean wooden roller and roll over a few times pressing down quite hard. That is the only thing I use this wooden roller for - I picked it up at a thrift store so I have no idea what brand it is but it works great. Any hard roller would do.
Fall is upon us! Currently it is 60 degrees outside, and I am FREEZING! I hate everything about cold weather, and my nose is already running from the coldness! It has only been cool for 2 days but I am already so ready for Summer and HOT weather! Give me the sun beating down on my skin, where you can practically feel your skin sizzling in the heat, that’s what I love. But alas, it is fall, and after fall comes winter, and I have a lot of cold left to endure this year.
The military statement, labeled “Communique No. 2” after a statement a day earlier, endorsed Mubarak’s plan to transfer some powers to Omar Suleiman.
Hole-in-the-Wall, South Africa.
Hopefully I will get to eventually see photos that other people too, including our group photo. I mean, at the very least I need something for my scrapbook!
Offering an early-morning Cuppa Joe toast to the new day.
Actually, I received a Build-A-Bear from an old boyfriend as a just-because present. I was truly touched at the thoughtfulness of the gift.
Tell me, what is it you plan to do
I’m sure kids would love to make these, all that rolling and getting very sticky and making a mess of the kitchen !!
Wow! Talk about having a grand vision! Is that what the world has been asking for? A service that collects all of the visual data in the world and let's anyone tune in to anywhere? And here I thought it was just about making your crappy cell phone photos look like crappy film photos. Michel Foucault is no doubt looking down from that great panopticon in the sky, shaking his head slowly side to side, and saying "I knew it! Don't say I didn't warn you!" (or rather, Je le savais! Ne dites pas que je ne vous avais pas avertis! No one speaks English in heaven. ;) )
I am planning on working on another one with this week's TAST.
Soon after, during the fall semester of my junior year of college, I was required to read another Thomas Hardy book, The Mayor of Casterbridge, for one of my literature classes. I loved it, just as Mom had said I would love Tess.
But as you know getting hold of armor isn’t difficult in former fortress Norway. These m-f’s are now calling my ancient capital “Medina”. So be it.
As we live our lives, we each experience regular, lower-case “days”. We go to work. We grocery shop. We send some emails. We eat a sandwich. We hang out with our families. We do the stuff and have the somewhat unremarkable, rather forgettable experiences that make up the bulk of our lives. But then there are life-altering, stunning upper-case “Days”. A parent’s death. A child’s birth. The day we get married. The day you get laid off. The day you run your first marathon. These Days can be filled with joy and excitement or pain and terror, but they fundamentally change us and how we live our lives from that point forward.
That's it. I'm going home to rip out my whole garden. Starting over!
So much for capturing him in a photo, wearing something other than a sports t-shirt.
This newer nationalism transcended the older nationalism of the one nation in an attempt to unite all Northwestern Europeans under some sort of a superior Nordic or White Race. At the same time, pan-Slavism and even Islamism developed (Yes, modern Islamism only dates to around 1900 or so).
Welding, a process that uses high heat to melt and join metals, is widely used across various industrial sectors such as construction, shipbuilding and bridge construction. “Just about anything that uses metal can and is usually welded,” says Tadic.
Preheat oven to 300.
BLITZER: We’re continuing the debate here in Jacksonville, Florida.
"No. I'm not. I want them to pay and I want you to help me do it."
Otherwise, veer off now!
But continue to speak out against the lies;
'The journey is just beginning, but for now...she's all giggles! Noah (6) played Addison's favorite iPhone app (babies laughing, cooing, etc) on the iPad and she could not stop smiling and laughing at them, probably because they are SO much bigger on iPad!'
Secretary Herminio Coloma says the government’s communications strategy has four phases. The first phase includes the President’s website. If the strategy fails after the first phase, the second phase, the third phase, they shall proceed to the fourth: saving face.
What’s good:
The good man does something negative: He does not walk in the way of the sinners, etc. He won’t even take a stroll through the wickedness of the unrighteousness. Instead, day and night he is chewing on the Word of God. It is his waking and sleeping thought.
Layout and Atmosphere: Once you find your way in through the car park, following the little 'Tango' signs, the hall is a good sized concert hall. It has a stage at the far end, a mezzanine at the near end, and glass doors opening onto the patio along the far half of the left hand side as you come in. You enter through the bar, where they had the table with everyone's bookings, and the t-shirts for sale. There's also a lobby at the back where there were displays of shoes and dresses, and a room where you could get a massage at certain times - I failed to take advantage, but I was busy dancing. Chairs and tables were arranged around all sides except where the glass doors were, with two rows of tables at either end and enough room to walk behind nearly all of them, plus more seating under the mezzanine at the back. The location of the DJ booth on the mezzanine is prominent and honourable, but practically not ideal, making it difficult for the DJ to gauge the mood of the floor. Although everyone had their own seat, people did move around quite a bit because of the slight layout problems created by the mezzanine and the lights along the front of it (which made it hard to see people sitting underneath). The floor was good - a good wooden floor, slightly sticky in places on the first afternoon but about right for me after a bit of talc went down. The hall looked nice, with long blue and yellow curtains, blue chairs and purplish tablecloths. The little patio with the pink roses was lovely.
One-by-one, two-by-two, the seat were filled and we were on our way. We exited the Central Valley via route 32 that runs directly through the breathtaking national park that is Braulio Carrillo. I look out my kitchen windows everyday and see this stretch of mountains not realizing until now the extent of it’s beauty. The route takes you literally through the mountain and into the clouds. Prehistoric is really the only way to describe the forest; the trees are dripping with moss and there are leaves larger than umbrellas.
We have also had the opportunity to extensively tour the medina here; seeing weavers, coppersmiths, potters, and tanners at work. Lots of neat photos and not a few artisan souvenirs will be headed back with us. Shopping here is an amazing experience. Our guides have taken us to some of the best artisan shops, and we have been treated with amazing customer service. Imagine being served mint tea while you sit on comfy cushions and merchants toss rug after rug on the floor before you. A bit more tantalizing than a trip to Target!
I tend to notice things that are odd or out of place, sometimes it’ll smack me right on the face, sometimes (quite rarely) I will get dreams about certain thing – it’s hard to explain, it’s just a feeling that I trust and it’ll point me to a certain direction.
I am a 56 year old woman that still has dreams and thoughts that take me elsewhere from my day to day adventures. I am to be myself and not covet another's lifestyle, life, relationship, position or belongings. God desires that I lean on Him. He has great and mighty things for me. I simply have to ask Him and He will show me. There are surprises lined up for me and there are surprises lined up for you.
Well this is a much more respectable time don't you think?
33
and peace
We hope to jump start your mojo with our 91th sketch.
it is a profound source of spirituality.
It was the month of March, marking its end when my friends asked me to visit Kollam. They said I have to attend a celebration that I have not witnessed in my life, man transformed to woman. It would indeed be a miracle to witness the operation making this possible. Life is short and you cannot be sure of your lifeline. I thus decided to witness it.
The second thing is you need to offer her anything that may substitute money. If cash is the for you to her door, and you wouldn't have this key, then you might want to fit a lock-pick. What generally is a substitution for money and guarantee The Girl of Your Dream any time she chooses you this may be the appropriate choice to be with her and on her behalf children – And the solution is. You need to point out through your actions that you're the only man with whom she would comfy. That your kids could have their best chances in life, survive, and life can be prosperous. Substitute money with your regular focus on her and her interests, offer her small presents, displaying that she is significant to you.
9/18 – Austin – Jesse Dayton @ The Broken Spoke & Rhett Miller @ Threadgills
Isn't the human body amazing? My finger is regenerating, I don't know how my finger nail will end up but the fingertip is plumping out a bit and is growing skin. It's no longer the clean slice that gives me the heebee jeebies. More like I had an incident with the cheese grater. No biggie. Its still very sensitive and a bit mishapen, but it is something that I can live and work with and I'm happy. WHEW!
My posting has been a little sporadic the last couple of months, feast and famine, due to being busy with work and other good life stuff. As it has been fun (mostly) having even a tiny voice in the online gaming community, the time I devote to game shit lately has actually been devoted more to actual gaming and less about droning on and on in a blog about the geeky side of my fairly non-geeky life. I have no aspirations to write games or adventures, fanzines, or to share charts and maps from my own games. And hell, there’s just too big a glut of all that anyway, just like gaming blogs. You either make that a big part of your life or you don’t. I don’t read more blogs, join more blogs, or seek to increase my following more because I just don’t have time to do it. Plus it is not as exciting to me as it was when I discovered there was an OSR around three years ago. Honeymoon period over, you know? And in recent months I’ve realized the truth of it; the actual gaming is far more important than talking about it or reading about it. Playing the game is always more fun than hearing about it.
—Philippians 4:13"
At one point, I knew I could’ve said some things to make it hurt less. I could’ve said that I wasn’t 100% certain that the love was lost. I could’ve said that I still wanted to try more. Those things would’ve been truths. But would they have just delayed the inevitable? Would they have made it hurt worse for him in the end? Maybe. So I swallowed those words and let nature take its course.
Thousands of Large families and groups of college kids alike flock to this river throughout the sweltering Texas summer.
In essence, the main role of the regular army was to deny the PIRA the ability to move and operate with ease and impunity. Taking the fight back to them was something that required the unique abilities of special forces and proactive intelligence-gathering services: to carry out surveillance in republican areas (14 Intelligence Company’s speciality), to bug houses of known republicans, to stage ambushes when intelligence of forthcoming attacks was available (most notoriously at Loughgall in 1987, when the SAS shot dead eight PIRA men), to stake out weapons caches, and to capture or kill terrorists who went to retrieve weapons from them. Broadly speaking, we expect a similar pattern to emerge with respect to the deployment of army units during our Muslim Troubles, with the regular army used to patrol and man checkpoints, and with special forces used to conduct intelligence-led surveillance and armed operations.
The muse seems hellbent on earrings and earrings only for right now. Much like Google, she is diabolical. I tried making a bracelet over the weekend and wow...is it ever FUGLY. It's already occupying center stage in the re-do area, but it will have to wait. I can already tell that any attempt to re-do it at this point will only result in more wasted time, material and tears.
Rotation: 2 months ON/OFF.
Because of being with him, the unsurpassable ocean of the Kuru’s strength
In such a diverse city, it’s hard to believe that one person couldn’t find something for their own personal niche of nerdom. From comics, to food, to theater, to history, in Philadelphia, there are all sorts of applications to go along with any particular brand of operating system.
And now they are taking on yet another task – going after citizens who are exercising their civil liberties enshrined in the Constitution of the country.
23 Paces to Baker Street is a Fox production and remains absent on DVD in both the US and the UK, however, I believe there’s a copy of the film available in Spain but I haven’t seen it. Instead I picked up the Australian release by Bounty Films when it was issued late last year. The disc is completely barebones, but the transfer is pretty good. The movie is presented correctly in anamorphic scope and although it doesn’t appear to have undergone any kind of restoration there’s no especially distracting damage either. The colours are strong, the film has been transferred progressively and the price is acceptable. The only beef I have with the presentation, and it’s a very minor one, is the curious decision to market the title as part of the Bounty Noir Classics line – this is a standard mystery/whodunit and doesn’t even approach noir territory. This is an entertaining, glossy and well-paced thriller that’s capable of holding the viewer’s interest from beginning to end. I found it satisfying and have no problem giving it the thumbs up.
Well, Dean Koontz is a name that I’ve heard many times and very long ago but surprisingly, I’ve never read any of his books until now.
Piano Lessons
Maybe not our best effort but at least we are all there smiling :)
Anticipation seems to be a universal of all living things. Cats wait outside the mouse-hole, squirrels bury nuts for the winter, birds build nests for the expected new arrivals. We humans with our expanded mental abilities quite possibly are capable of more anticipation than any other living organism. As children we count the almost-infinite number of days to Christmas, or the interminable hours spent in the back seat of the car until we’re finally there.
special DVD inside. As you may notice, I was
Deion will be 12 next week...how did THAT happen...my baby, but its impossible to know what to get right after Xmas.
I think the change was implemented to help slow down account hacking. If you think about it the forums are the perfect place to brute force attack a username/password combination; as its a web based delivery system that has to be tollerant to many different interfaces, and has been around a very long time. That means it was probably installed to be a basic solution, and became the juggernaut before anyone really saw what was happening.
Something to think about……
by Martha Roger
Our fortune cookies were not the crisp, thin and perfectly folded objects of perfection that we'd imagined. Instead, they were decidedly thicker and they stubbornly refused to be folded without breaking in half - every time. Pudding Pie was not heavily impressed. (Observe the look of disdain.)
An Illinois band. Most of the members had been playing together in bands for several years; Bakalar and Kerestes since March 1965.
If something happens when I am out of the room, it is my fault, not theirs. I apologize for leaving them alone and we can all move on. There is no need to blame or punish the kids. No matter how hard you try, you can't be sure that you have gun-proofed your child so you can comfortably leave the child alone with it. Locking up the gun is the better option.
I know I should show only one picture but I couldn't choose...which one do you like best?
Not only in the field of chemical manufacturing, but these engineers also work in a variety of other manufacturing industries. This, in turn, increases the career scope for these professionals. Industries like electronics, food, paper and clothing have multiple scope for chemical engineers. Apart from working in these industries, these engineers can also join fields like healthcare and biotechnology. By gaining more experience and expertise, engineers can also choose to specialize in a specific area according to their interest and preference. They can either choose to specialize in a specific chemical process or products. Chemical engineers can specialize in chemical processes like oxidation, polymerization or nanomaterials.
I found out yesterday that I won our Society of Children's Book Writers and Illustrator's regional chapter's grant for the summer conference! Here's the official announcement:
Coffee on the patio this morning. The sun really looks nice and warm today!
We were lucky to get the services of poet and creative writer tutor, Barbara Smith, who held the first session last evening. The ten members present enjoyed the experience and claimed to have learned a lot from the exercises. We'll be watching and reporting on any improvements noticed!!!
O. Abram believed what God had said to him. He had faith in God's word. He trusted God. Because of this he was seen as righteous.
At a certain point in the summer I prune the bush varieties - I cut out extra leaves and new flowers....enough is enough!!! I did it after this photo was taken....
– Manufactured by “Majestic Athletic”
VERED
2) "Wigger". This one came to me while thinking of the first one. The lexicon has moved on, let's find a new way to mock these ethnically challenged losers.
big stone castles would look like at
Ah, what a joy to know that one is at the cutting edge of corporate cost-cutting human resources policy. The paper will be the poorer for it, and all my former colleagues will have to work that much harder to fill the staffing gap, but the shareholders will see a .001% increase in their dividend this quarter.
With Cincinnatus in tow, we went to visit the home of our initial contact, Kendra Lorrimer, who wanted to introduce us to somebody new. He was Metharel, an elven wizard from the university of Lepidstatd, who was interested in finding out who'd broken into the university and stolen the artifact (a plot hook for this particular adventure).
I think the anticipation of returning to the grind is worse than going through with it.
The whole ordeal was over shortly afterward and the doctor had ordered, among other things, some X-rays and range of motion check on some of my joints. I had then resolved that I would continue on with the rest of the day without having to get naked, probed and poked (in no particular order) again.
But in the midst of all the packing and shipping, there's still been a little time for decorating. With all the traveling my husband and I do over the holidays, I don't go all out with Christmas decorations at our little house. It just makes the beautiful trees and lights at our parents homes in Ohio that much more special next to our own undecked halls. But with a few wintery touches here and there and a couple of wonderful new finds from my last antiquing trip, our livingroom has a fresh winter look in blue, white, and grey that is perfect even long after the holidays are over.
adding something like their chipotle southwest sauce. Oddly enough I would be ok with that, because at that point youve got a chipotle pork sandwich and I don’t care what the hell you do.) This is a pulled pork sandwich in the classic barbecue pulled pork sense, and tossing the meat in the sauce would be the best option.
Gaze upon the Giving God
1 cup rice wine vinegar
Team ERA: 4.08
Her eyes went wide behind the eyeholes of her mask, and she pulled hard against her bonds, “No! Fuck! Have you seen his files? You don’t know-”
And thro' the field the road runs by
Set in a Roman Catholic monastery in the desert of the south-western United States after a devastating nuclear war, the story spans thousands of years as civilization rebuilds itself. The monks of the fictional Albertian Order of Leibowitz take up the mission of preserving the surviving remnants of man's scientific knowledge until the day the outside world is again ready for it. – Wikipedia
Think about lunch.
2. It’s a no-calorie no brainer.
In their report Price Water House Coopers suggested that though magazines do need to invest in digital platforms they should not put all their eggs in one basket.
Either way, the point is that the mistletoe doesn’t get used very often. And yet, every year I continue to put it up as part of the decorations. Maybe I need to start wearing the hats the guys in high school used to wear with the mistletoe connected to get my guy to kiss me underneath it?
"That's very kind. Things are okay for now. Besides, I couldn't expect you to help the enemy." She stood still, afraid to face him. Afraid of the concern he'd show.
Here is the photo for this month:
In Ibaraki Prefecture, the makers of Hitachino Nest Beer report some damage to facilities, but they expect to be back in operation within a week. Ushiku Beer reports they will be affected by electrical blackouts in the coming week, but are continuing operations. Shimotsuma Beer is taking a break from operation for inspections, but haven't said when operations will restart.
As Gillard zeroes in on her working class base, she looks set to return to the Labor arguments of old. In the process, she may find that the arguments have a deeper resonance and get a wider traction than expected. The centre of Australian politics might be about to migrate left.
Instead of using Disney, companies should take a look at the 100 year old Fenway Park – home of the Boston Red Sox. Unlike Disney World where you and your family can ‘celebrate’ with thousands of strangers, at Fenway Park you celebrate with thousands of fans, who share their loyalty with the team and the Park. Fans aren’t sharing a vacation; they are sharing values, cheers and insults, their personal history, their family’s history and the team’s history.
You could make your very own gift basket and add some personal touches to it. Buy a wicker basket and line it with colorful paper. Fill up the basket with all the stuff your partner likes and wrap it up with ribbon. Create a theme around the basket. For instance, you could gift your Valentine a set of DVDs, a pack of popcorn along with any other goodies that they might enjoy while watching movies.
2. Not associating your provider in the PCB layout whole process: There are lots of subtleties in producing a flex circuit; the point that its flex creates obstacles for layout that a hard board won’t face. Your company might help design a products that is more reliable, much easier to construct and eventually more economical. Forcing your supplier to build up Printed circuit board may end up in more quality complications, poor punctual delivery and a less reliable gadget.
Today's new edition of Saturday Sharing reflects just how eclectic the Web's offerings are. Take a moment and browse the maps at Flowing Data, a site dedicated to computer scientist Alan Turing, the interactive Body & Soul, ballet in ultra slow-motion, and a digital archive of World War I poetry. Also enjoy listening to today's video recording of Marian McPartland's musical tribute to environmentalist Rachel Carson.
Down to the trash,
and with joyful smiles,
Evidently I have fractured one of the higher vertebrae at some time, but luckily it healed without adding to my problem. I have a feeling that it may have happened when I injured my shoulder, and the pain may have been masked by the pain I already have in my back.
So then we have to take into account what they really want in their world, which, as sad as it is, may not be us.
And they blocked our way.
But the L.A. Zoo won and Billy's new home will be unveiled to the public on December 16th. Eventually, as many as 11 elephants could live there and it will be the largest elephant habitat in North America! We're very excited for Billy, and we're pretty sure he's happy, too!
exiles from delight
Your overwhelming love for the orphan is incredible and we are all forever grateful!
All of the independent experts, who are not in the pay or salary of the anti-smoker industry, agree that this piece of ideological revenge to destroy legitimate industry, in spite of its law abiding consumers and the thousands of unnecessary job losses, will not stop young people smoking.
Based on the book by Marinovich and Silva, The Bang Bang Club tells the true story of these four young men, recounting their relationships with each other and the stresses, tensions and moral dilemmas of working in situations of extreme violence, pain and suffering.
I'm really glad I went (even though the capital city of our departement is about an hours drive) and that Mystery Guest could join me. Sometimes a ceremony is really nice, it really finalizes something, takes shape and becomes more meaningful than a letter saying congratulations. Plus it didn't drag on for ages, short, sweet and to the point which was perfect. :-)
My vacation isn’t always complete without me taking pictures of the flowers I see in every tour. Nothing exotic, nothing fancy. These were all taken using plain iP4, the only editing done was for added text using Fotolr PS app. See how vibrant and vivid and sharp the images are! Too bad I only saw few flowers…
Day 013 – August 4, 2011
last few years, as it keeps breaking down, showing me how many things
A piano and nothing else. Gestures captured by microphones placed inside its body (Asher already resorted to this compositional paradigm, successfully, in a recent past), the pressing of keys distinctly audible, series of notes which periodically repeat themselves, a pulsating melody intentionally mingled with a persistent noise generated by the helicopter blades.
Petunia thought she understood: so they had money to burn, and in a hurry! She nodded, and smiled- it was a simply marvellous place, after all. Their waiter had told them all the stories about its history- about Sinatra dancing on the tables with Ava Gardner, and about high jinks in the underground caverns during the war. Then the waiter had whisked them all off for a tour- and shown them the old underground well that gave the restaurant its name. He’d suggested they might like to throw a coin in for luck (and a tip, presumably) and the Vogue team had spotted an opportunity. They’d starting flinging about wads of notes and oodles of cash, and then asked the waiter (who looked just about ready to faint with joy) if they could have a receipt for their accountant…
BUT I'm please to say that since the new year, I've actually made a start!
Shouldn’t that be our focus every day ?
Hume says, "For as to the notion of external existence, when taken for something specifically different from our perceptions, we have already shown its absurdity" (Treatise 1.4.2, Of scepticism with regard to the senses). Hume is not a skeptic whose empiricism entails codifying Cartesian scepticism as irrefutable. To the contrary, Hume takes the position that Cartesian scepticism is a pseudo-problem. An idea that unifies the Treatise is that, contrary to the rationalists’ assertion that logical proof is the paradigm of knowledge, there are in fact no logical proofs for anything we “know” (and Hume is very much focused, as any good epistemologist should be, on the appropriate conditions for the use of the verb “to know”). To “know” something, for Hume, is to be habituated to have a certain expectation of potential future experiences by the regularities of past experiences.
As well, the sudden shift in the Nasdaq 100 ETF (QQQ) also grabbed my attention. The traders, like the S&P 100 index option traders, are best taken at face value. And right now they have shifted to trading quite a few calls relative to puts:
My mum works in antenatal screening, as a midwife. Her job is tough. She is the person who will tell you at your scan that abnormalities have been found. She is the person’s face who you will remember when your world falls apart. I can’t imagine doing her job – I think some days are pretty difficult, but no way near as difficult as they are for the parents she’s dealing with.
I realise that everyone is busy at this time of year, so you will have the option to make something for our January challenge, or start after the New Year and your first creations will be for the February challenge.
oppose John Maynard Keynes!
As for our dual status, it's something that's allowed;
This Chicago born playwright and, Gordon Brown appointed. Deputy chairman of the British Museum, who has lived in England since the 1980's but speaks with voice resonating in mint juleps and Acacia blossom, in the apparent belief that an Antebellum note might give her the credibility of a Maya Angelou, whilst at the same time evoking images of slavery, is as fake as is her accent.
I am heading to Naples for some r&r on Thursday with my sister & I cannot wait! I am planning to get as tan as humanly possible without burning (isn't that every girl's goal in a hot climate?).
- Easter was a super fun weekend. The men took off to the furthest remote places by snowmobile while Elasta Woman and i hid Easter Baskets for the kids, did egg coloring and tested our "fitness" on 9 grueling stages out of my "Fitness" magazine. Would you believe i just barely achieved "Super Star" status (LOL!!). After ward we had an amazing BBQ with the exhausted men.
Juju
handen
R&D Design Engineer
and we rest upon the fact that we are merely an instrument
i take a lot of baths.
Our mouths were filled with laughter, our tongues with songs of joy. Then it was said among the nations, “The LORD has done great things for them.” ~ Psalm 126:2
2 750-ml bottles Ommegang Belgian-style Abbey Ale (Reserve yourself a glass to enjoy while you cook, and pour the rest in the pot!)
Number of Pages: 256
More people must worship Him. More mouths must sing. More hearts must feel. More voices must resound and echo into the world the glories of God in the face of Jesus Christ. This is my motivation. I want more worship. And I think that God would say the same thing, “I want more worship.”
Well, I finally did locate it - in my mailbox, after having to buy another copy. But it was worth it, for this is a very fine record.
This year my little L is in LOVE with horses. Especially 'My Little Pony' horses. And I don't mean the ones they sell at the store today. A while ago I unpacked my huge containter of My Little Ponies that I had when I was growing up..you know..the REAL ones!!! She was instantly in love with them and whenever we go out she chooses a special horse to accompany her. A few months ago I asked her what she wanted for Christmas and she told me a stable...for all her horses. Well, this poses a delima for me because I can sew, crochet, modpodge, etc, etc...but I can not build anything from wood! Oy! What was I to do! So this is when I asked my Dad...who can build ANYTHING...to help me. I told him that L wanted a stable for her My Little Ponies for Christmas and let it be his special gift to her. My dad designed and built it for her and it turned out absolutly beautiful! I can't even begin to express how thankful I am for my dad and all the things he does for my little girls. He's amazing! After my dad finished the project he sent me the detailed instructions with pictures of the whole process. All I know is that this was such a special gift for Leia and I know it is something that will be forever treasured by my little girl and passed on through the generations! I Love you Dad!
I also spoke about aborigines and perhaps the need for “wild human” sanctuaries for members of tribes such as the aborigines of Australia and Botswana.
No loving no caring no program for pairing
The N-word made you a goner.
K and the kids filled some bags with little soaps, toothbrushes, feminine hygiene products and a load of diapers, all generously donated through the outreach of Help A Mother Out.
Answer: first one, not the latter.
Sometimes the greatest artists find that the best partner is, well…themselves. I’ve been listening to pianist Bill Evans’ “Conversations with Myself” lately and that’s what I thought of when I saw this number. Although I was taken aback by seeing Astaire in black face, his intention to pay homage to Bill “Bojangles” Robinson (still alive in 1936) and to celebrate other great dancers who came before him is clear.
I have a photo of my son as my wallpaper. My son is laughing at how scary and demented I made him look in my drawing.
Well I was visiting one of my favourite stores today and I picked up the cutest little note pad that I wanted to share with everybody. It is another little tool that I plan on using to get my organised life back.
Oh, Grandma.
That is what Adam Selipsky of Amazon feels. He says it may not happen overnight, it may take 5, 10 or even 20 years, but it will happen over time.
After that I spent the vast majority of my pocket money on the monthly Best Ofs and acquiring huge wads of 2000AD back issues, which I could sniff out like a bloodhound at carboot sales and flea markets.
fully in position.
I’ve told you all this because I want to send you a message, DON’T BE ME! There’s a tiny piece of me that’s wishes I could go back to school and pursue my dream but school costs money. Money I don’t have. These are the kind of moments in life where I wish I hadn’t gotten myself into such deep shit. Learn from me. Don’t live in the moment, live for the life you want in the future.
2 cups walnut halves
Hi everyone! Welcome to August's Stamp Simply Ribbon store blog hop -this month's theme is Autumn Splendor. Any way that this may take you with colors, images, theme or holidays.
Photographed by Rama
I'm considering buying one for the Steampunk Study, just for the lovely chimes.
We woke this morning to six new piglets (they’re cute when they’re small) and Polly’s long awaited calf, D…uncan! We went down for a quick visit and photo shoot before getting to work on a day of potting up tomatoes and direct seeding turnips and lettuce mix. Here’s everyone, including Charlotte, Albert, and Blue, all lined up for the camera.
At that time he was offered a plea bargain: He could plead guilty to something he didn’t do and be charged with a misdemeanor, or he could face years in prison. But Chuck could not swear to a falsehood. Instead, he pled guilty to a different charge, and he and his family paid the price. The story is all in “Born Again.” If you’ve never read it, we have it for you at the Colson Center bookstore online.
There might be a little lull in recipe linkage on the menu plan in the next few weeks, but hopefully I can learn to adapt some recipes and then share them!
“Yes I said side saddle! I don’t have much time, so could you please hurry up?”
Lest this great sea of joys rushing upon me
What is okay for Christians to watch/read/hear? Where do we draw the line?
In any event, I thank all of you for your time, even if it was just a moment to skim something and roll your eyes, and I hope you continue to give Dustin-flavored projects a chance in the future. You guys are my heroes. Like Enrique Iglesias.
‘Cause there ain’t no doubt I love this land
Well, we are well into the twenty-third day of the 2012 and it is only up until now that I came up with something to say.
Recently both Hannah and Gary attended once again for another photography shoot at our studio and my how Hannah has grown! She is now what you call “blooming” in her pregnancy and looks absolutely radiant. Her weight has obviously increased but nothing that she won’t be able to easily lose once the little one is here.
This is a rights transfer on a massive scale that makes the Google Book Settlement look benign. By including any out of print book--not just those whose rightsholders can't be located--it goes far beyond the issue of orphan works. By forcing authors to opt out in order to regain control of their work, it turns copyright law on its head. The problem of orphan works urgently needs solution--but not via measures like this.
All in all an interesting days outing. I also got to see plenty of sea lions swimming about and sunbathing on buoys, and a fantastic view of the Seattle skyline during the ferry ride. If you have any interest in Naval history I can thoroughly recommend Bremerton as a good day trip.
The incredible score includes Bright New Day, Marilyn Monroe and the emotionally charged hit Tell Me It’s Not True. Hailed as one of the best musicals of all time – scooping up no less than four awards for best musical in London and seven Tony Award nominations on Broadway – Blood Brothers is currently booking into its 20th year. The recommended age for children is age 12 and above. Children under the age of 4 will not be admitted to the theatre.
Nearly 60 Colorado beers and 30 breweries will be on display in downtown Fort Collins at the Colorado Brewers’ Festival. Live music and beer talks pepper the atmosphere. This is where Coloradans comes out to support the country’s best state for beer.
The best thing about these jeans (besides the zippers, obvs) is that the white denim is NOT SEE THROUGH. No one needs to see this pale bootie through practically sheer, white denim.
Cox’s Bazar town with an area of 6.85 km², is located at 21°35′0″N 92°01′0″E and bounded by Bakkhali River on the north and East, Bay of Bengal in the West, and Jhilwanj Union in the south.
If you’re not careful, those little things, that are most memorable, will just pass you by.
Which means guess what? Pretty much everyone is in bed with a marketer to some degree. Whores, all of us!
* Experience with analytical manipulation and interpretation of large databases required
feeling cosy and sleepy:
y era de que recapacitaba
*Although the snowed in bit is not really recommended in some aspects it worked out really well!
Some frequently asked questions about the list
It seems that peoples’ words have only the value given to them by their followers or their leaders and not by truth and knowledge which is being attacked from every angle by many with power and capital.
There is no privacy. We are accountable at all times for who we are and how we act.
Bake for 15 – 20 minutes or until golden brown.
And if you're so inclined, why not visit the New York City Fire Museum? It's in SoHo and afterwards you can take a stroll down to the Financial District and imagine what it all might have looked like.
incredibly sexy standing there talking to his friends . He was
So here's to the lady in the black pants and the white shirt! If I could be there to fluff her skirt and man her elevator, I would.
Apparently, there is no lack of fan-fiction to fill the void. Not the least of which is a BBC radio dramatization entitled "The Further Adventures of Sherlock Holmes" Volume 1-4.
Me: Hi, I’m here to do some funeral planning for my father. He’s a veteran, so the interment and perpetual care are already taken care of…
It goes on to discuss this and ways you can help your children in greater detail. I found the research and article supports most of my assumptions about the importance of teaching empathy at a young age and how you choose to discipline your children. Click here to read the whole TIME article .
In the summer of 1949, while young Dick Clark was attending Syracuse University, his father hired him to do odd jobs around the radio station, including filling in for the announcers on the air. In 1951, after graduating with a degree in advertising with a minor in radio broadcasting, Dick Clark took a job reading the nightly news at WKTV-TV Channel 2 in Utica, replacing Robert Earle who became host of a TV game show called the GE College Bowl. It was at this station where Dick Clark hosted his first television music show, Cactus Dick and the Santa Fe Riders. Just a year later, Dick Clark would be in Philadelphia working as a disc jockey at WFIL-AM 560. There was a music program on WFIL-TV at the time called Bob Horn's Bandstand and Dick Clark was asked to start a similar show on radio, and would also stand in occasionally for Bob Horn on his television show. On 9 July 1956, after Bob Horn was arrested and jailed for drunk driving, Dick Clark took over as permanent host of Bandstand.
I do not need to ask you to imagine how our media would react had over three thousand members of an ethnic minority been tortured to death by whites, in the same time period, in any majority white nation on earth. The media's outrage would be unconstrained, and rightly so, for this amounts to more than one violent, racially motivated, death every second day for fifteen years.
The condescension isn't particularly shocking -- it's commonplace. (Even the "I'm sure all those books are well written" part is condescending. Why should they all be well-written? Find me one genre of books in the publishing industry where every single book is well-written. Children's literature has the same range of quality as every other genre.) What's more surprising is that the New York Times considered this printworthy.
Thanks to Henry and Jack for making the time to speak with us, and to all at Modo for their work with current and previous placement students.
“Take the money we’re no longer spending at war, use half of it to pay down our debt, and use the rest to do some nation-building right here at home.”
Once the characters are victorious, the Maiden of the Fields of Berries and Briars will congratulate them, apologizing for her earlier claims against their honor. She will pay for their wounds with bottles of berry-wine, toasting them and asking each to raise a horn. As the heir drinks, she disappears and he is branded on the tongue with the glyph for water. Although he loses three hit points and is probably extremely annoyed, the glyph will aid him in the final battle as he will bleed water it produces rather than his own juices. This prevents aggravation of Major Wounds.
MyHeritage.com has a fun application on their site which scans face pictures and, using some kind of futuristic facial recognition software, compares that face to a celebrity.
SWS Energy Acquires Lisheen Windfarm From Lisheen Mines 12
that the miner sweated for
There have been quite a few attempts to pin down how to advance it safely across various browser issues with little success. Kevin Deldycke put together a solution for the slider auto-advance, and showcased a unique way of applying that solution.
THE GOOD THINGS
Yes, I am indeed writing another (children's) shoe post. I do love children's shoes (I don't buy lots of shoes for myself, though).
Mizuno has been endorsed with the Seal of Acceptance by the American Podiatric Medical Association. This endorsement is made to make a significant contribution to the foot health and let the people know about the importance of having the proper footwear.
** Proposals to the international accounting community
I only really approach other people once I've started writing. When I'm coming up with storylines I don't talk to anyone else. I want them to be purely from my own mind. Other people are good for editing purposes, but I don't let them near the stories themselves.
Something I do and still and practicing but I find it very helpful is every time I have a judgement about myself I try to reverse it or replace it. So if i think “i’m fat and need to lose weight” i replace it with ” I’m getting healthy and still working on gaining which means i am not fat”. I use logic and rationale to attack the judgement. Sometimes i can’t turn it around so i replace it with another thought.
As it had been a few years since my last visit, I’ve been teasing the idea of visiting Ukraine once more to re-check my conclusion. After receiving several requests from local student groups to come lecture about multiple flags and entrepreneurship, I now had a good reason to do so.
I just love February's patterned paper from Papertrey called Pacific Vineyard which I just happened to use here. I also added a stamp from PTI from the set Delightful Doilies, and a sentiment from Big & Bold Wishes stamp set. I started with a base of ripe avocado and layered that with a piece of white but gave it a nice border using Martha Stewart's doily lace edger. I followed the sketch but noticed a slight little problem ... one of my squares is off a bit. Oh well maybe it's not that noticeable if I don't mention anything ... hehehe! I stamped a doily in fresh snow ink and heat embossed it with white ep on fine linen cardstock. I also stamped and embossed the sentiment Hey There in white and mounted it with foam tape. And that's that! hehehe Here's one more shot ...
“Okay, why is your safe word SHARK and my safe word TOFU? I mean TOFU has to be the lamest, weakest word in existence. Can you imagine what an actual shark could do to a piece of tofu? I think you’ve weakened my stance in the argument with my safe word choice alone!”
–Grouping cross servers is now broken.
"Occupy Wall St: The Revolution is Inspiring" is a well-done bit of film-making. (Next, I shall have to watch "Hot Chicks of Occupy Wall Street," another of the scheduled offerings. THAT is an effective title... and I hope the film lives up to it!)
So many of Slick Rick's other songs are party/club staples, but "Hey Young World" is the classic that is sometimes forgotten. Yet when it comes on, like acid flashbacks for a nation of assimilated negroes, schoolyard memories flood the brain, and all forms of pretense and posturing must fade to the background. Produced by Rick himself; the smooth string loop, dinky-dinky-dink toy-piano riff, and bouncy back-and-forth flow with what can now only be described as his "gay voice" essentially captures the carefree spirit of a hip hop nursery rhyme. An adorably irresistible encapsulation of hip hop's essence; it basically gets everyone within listening range in the mood for a game of freeze-tag or hide-and-go-seek.
Good Morning
Set up a reward system if you can. Show the fans you care. Spotlight a fan club member or a street team member for something they have done to both reward them and make others want to go after that reward too.
Ah well, those cloth caps and whippets jokes aren’t going away any day soon…
The Collective Media Magic Team is sponsoring a great prize package for any dad! Just Like June, Have Sippy Will Travel, Closer To Lucy, 3 Princes and A Princess 2, and That's What She Said are accepting sign-ups now. You will receive one free link of your choice on our rafflecopter form.
8 The Pearl 3:07
Beyond the options, there is also the style. Pulp has a glamour all its own. Women are seductive, sexy, and innocent all at the same time. The men, though usually the heroes, aren't the only ones and there are plenty of ladies who can dish it out like the boys. The action is fast and simple, the plots are tangled or direct as you need them. The environments are usually colorful and full of exciting denizens and stylish sets.
-at least 5 colors of tissue paper
devout to the very thing
But odds are that Scott Walker will go on believing that God wants him to give welfare to corporations that are struggling to make ends meet, and do it by making poor people pay higher taxes.
Quote: A happy person is not a person in a certain set of circumstances, but rather a person with a certain set of attitudes. ~ Hugh Downs
Now what kind of filling? I looked through lots of my recipes and finally decided on a family recipe for Chocolate Meringue Pie. I can remember sitting at my great-great aunt's table eating a piece of this pie along with a glass of cold milk after playing the piano for her. (As an aside, she left her piano to me. It is a Cable-Nelson Upright Grand that was made around 1906. The piano has lived with me since she crossed in 1974, but just this last Christmas I passed it on to Abbey.)
Even if you think you know all about the other person or the situation, you don't. Not until you've walked a mile in their shoes, can you truly understand. And you certainly don't know enough about a person or situation from reading a few lines on a blog. And I'm not just talking about myself. I mean ANY blog out there. Too often I hear from other bloggers that they've gotten nasty, hateful, or judgemental emails/comments from people. Just recently Peggy, from CarePages - ColemanScott, got some negative mail over the dumbest thing. Peggy is the sweetest woman with amazing faith and certainly didn't do anything to deserve negativity from ignorant people. (By the way, if you haven't already, check out her Care Page. She has 2 of the most adorable boys and I love how she writes phonetically the way the boys talk. It's too cute!)Anyway, I digress. All I want to say is - For crying out loud people, can't we all just get along?!!!
From: Philippines
I listened to my high school friends. I read their stories and poetry. I played their games. I entered their lives and watched how they engaged with people. I took note of what was important to them. I listened not only to their words but to their lives.
the only RULE being that you use at least ONE PENNY BLACK IMAGE, SENTIMENT or STICKEROO, there have been quite a few folks recently who obviously choose to ignore this, so if your entry does not include a Penny Black Image, it will be removed from the entries, sorry peeps, thems the rules! :-)
We are scheduled to close today at noon! Fingers crossed that everything goes well!!! We had our Pre-Close Walk Through Tuesday evening, and thought it went surprisingly well. With all the issues we've been having with the builder lately, neither of us was really looking forward to it, and I think we both arrived pretty down in the dumps - especially given the week of Hell we've been going through already. We haven't seen the inside of the house for at least a month, and it was amazing to see all the changes. They have a few touch-ups they needed to do before closing, and Eric is going there this morning to make sure it was all done and to do the final, final walk through. We will also still have to wait until (hopefully) next week for the sod to be installed, and then a couple more weeks before we can install the fence. Walking through the house and seeing (almost) everything finished made me really excited again to move into this house - nervous as hell - but excited. It was so pretty! It's hard to believe that we'll own it in just a few hours! After the closing we can finally start moving some boxes in. We're so crowded in the current house that we're not making any progress on packing or cleaning up the place. We've basically run out of room for boxes, and we can't get to much of anything to start cleaning up the house for the renters. I'll be happy to finally start making more progress, and clean out some of the clutter! Wish us luck!!!! Please enjoy these photos from our walk through:
There is always a certain ease and comfort in my body and mind after class that I had forgotten about and it came on very strong last night, magnified by my mind training I’m sure. Walking felt “perfect”, breathing was just breathing. It had a concentration quality to it, similar to access concentration and maybe even the low level spaciousness of borderline Samatha jhana states. I recall something like this after the one and only Hatha Yoga class I’ve ever taken. It’s going to be interesting to see how martial arts plays a roll in my mindfulness practice now that I can see the connections and why that would work.
Elizabeth followed her gaze, seeing the ground dark with shadows under the overhanging eaves. It reminded her of when she moved the sheep’s trough to find the grass dead underneath, but infested with wiggling white worms and shiny black beetles. A foul stench rose from the mud and she wrapped a linen scarf around her mouth to save her churning stomach from throwing up. Rats that would only been seen at night in the swept grounds of Shorecross, scurried in front of her over the piles of broken crockery and rotting food, tails scaly and gleaming.
1/2 cup grated parmesan cheese + 1/4 cup to mix in at the end
After months at a standstill, we finally started up work on the new addition again and got our main interior wall finished! I was MANICALLY happy to be out there pounding nails! Next weekend we'll be erecting the last 2 small walls and then it's on to powering up the room with electrical. Slow progress is better then NO progress and I am filled with glee when I get to don my manly tool belt!
10. The last email he sent me included “i will never forget you”
‘Easy Come Easy Go’ brings up the beat, and you can just imagine the band swayin side to side as this one flows easy off the instruments they play. ‘Ballad of a Fisherman’s Wife’, tune written to honor the families affected by the BP oil spill, Tony reminisces of the storytelling we came to know from ‘Your Rocky Spine’ with some of the most catchy phrases…..you better hurry up, and know it, i’m gonna love you til the end of the line!
Embellishments: Webster's Twine
My mother died suddenly and unexpectedly when I was 12. My dad's mistress moved in within a month of my mother's death, and, while my dad took me to one counseling session soon after my mother died, when I refused to speak, I guess he gave up. After that, my dad and his new wife never mentioned my mother again - in fact, they pretended as though nothing had happened. I had no idea how to deal with my mom's death. And my dad was too busy with my step-mother to pay attention to me or
Butt Bench: April G
Now, I know I didn’t tell it as compellingly as Shane did. There are more details and I may have even messed up some of them in this summary, but seriously, you cannot tell me this story is anything but filled with imagination, creativity and justice. It’s Jesus’ way or the highway, but sometimes Jesus’ way takes an alternate route around the ways of the world.
And this is why I am so damn used to feeling
I have some paints floating about somewhere, but I will happily resort to Roarke’s poster paints if I can’t find anything else!
I also got a very bright and plastic train for little one for £1.49 to keep her quiet, she's still playing with it so it must have been worth it ;) Oh and a small wooden picture frame that I will probably paint for 69p.
the winter shares are monthly
Al-Jamahiriya School site at Glebe Place, central London (Derek Quinlan sold to Orion Partners for a reported GBP 80-90m August 2011)
Image of: Socialist Francois Hollande wins French presidency
Passing under the railway leads me into Gomshall; with impeccable timing (or it might be luck, one of the two anyway), I just have long enough for a pint of Shere Drop at The Compasses before heading through the gloomy dusk to the station.
And to answer the inevitable question, yes, there are pictures to come. The wifey has the camera this evening.
Science deals mainly with facts;
I tend to rave about things to everyone within earshot when I love them –and that’s how I felt after reading, “The Brain Mechanic” by Spencer Lord. I brought it to the beach and it had me “think” differently about things I already knew. I had a question after reading it and contacted the author. We’ve since become good friends. I publicly endorsed his book, and I’m not the only one who thought it a GEM. See the reviews below. Then, make sure you pick up a copy. You’ll want to share what you learn with friends. I’m actually due to re-read it. The title is fitting because just like a car –we do need to service our brains too.
Media term it "summit fever", the apparent callousness that drives mountaineers to disregard ethics on their Everest ascents, sometimes literally climbing over dead bodies to reach their goals. But whatever the preparation and outlandish cost, perhaps it's not simply ruthless determination that makes someone abandon their team mates, and yet still have the energy to summit. In such alien conditions, utterly hostile to human life, climbers might face their own mortality. Under the spectre of pure, unadulterated fear, they must realize that they are beyond help as well as beyond helping anyone else.
Step 1: Wash green onions well, and cut in the middle if it’s too thick. Slice into about 3-4" lengths.
Well, it's that time of the year once again when I shutter to think about next year all the while not being done with this year. I need a break to rest my mind! But, I am forced to think about it-homeschool circles and friends are all talking about it and reading about it.
Our sex-addled culture, then, isn’t proof of liberation, it’s proof of addiction. Further, it’s proof that we’ve become so numb to the simple beauty and joy of a committed, monogamous sexual relationship that we need hard-core pornography and artificially modified women to help us get off.
Justice Hunter appeals to those interested in political thrillers with its often politicized language and may even appeal to the reader’s philosophical side with Hunter’s realizations about the justice system and society near the end of the book. It is a thriller in the truest sense of the word as both language and story play emotions up to keep the reader engaged all the way through. The ending is just as surprising as any other point in the book and just as the author teases in his description. The book is well-balanced and will leave the reader feeling exhilarated and satisfied.
to keep it real here...do not let the sweet pictures of ava deceive you. she was not on her best behavior per say. trying to teach a two year old...you can not always get what you want. not necessarily the easiest thing. but fun we had...happy birthday levi!
It seems that as my right side fine motor skills deteriorated, the first thing to go was the "flair." I believe my personality began to lose its flair too.
FunBites LuvIt: Tara M.
2C) Mountain Climbers
-any of the above categories with minimum $1,000 in property taxes for 3+ years
and focus on your breath.
--James Dashner, bestselling author of The Maze Runner and The Scorch Trials
All products used were Stampin Up! unless otherwise noted. This card is totally cased from Gloria Pluckett's SU! website. I didn't get to attend her class but loved the cards and decided to make them on my own. Thanks for inspiration Gloria!!
And democracy was trampled on in Brussels yesterday. In the heart of the European Union’s capital city, democracy was trashed, abused, and violated. The MSM’s response, almost unbelievably, was to ignore it or spin it to the detriment of those who took part.
Interesting resources on developments in standardizing accounting and valuation principles of intangibles assets, or intellectual capital:
Time is strange. A leisurely January afternoon in the mid-70s, for example. The same afternoon being exactly one day after Alexa's birthday and one day before Dad's birthday. The sun sparkling on the water. Alternately being lazy, lying on a bed of green grass on a cliff and walking around to do some whale watching.
“The Dark Initiate had remained true to his black creed to the very last, had arranged his affairs so that even his suicide should be a sacrificial tribute to the Powers of Darkness. April 30 is the ancient Feast of Beltane, the day which blends into Walpurgis Night. It is perhaps the most important date in the whole calendar of Satanism.”[13]
struggle, libidokempt denial
Favors: Something DIY, just haven't decided what they'll be yet.
Fortunately we were able to grab Jini for a few quick questions!
God's Grace.
The pros of our run were that we definitely built some serious character by waking up before dawn to run 15 miles, we got incorporated quite a few hills into our run, which is always helpful in preparing for trail running, and we had plenty of time to catch up.
Like the Bavarian barmaid you imagine delivering that frothy cup of goodness, Weissbier glasses are almost universally tall, curvaceous and of course brimming with radiant blonde beauty. They're typically sure-footed, with a slender midsection beneath a round, ample top. I'm sorry, are we still talking about glassware?
- Datorade 30 dates
Okay, time for bed now...I've had a busy day, digging up tulip bulbs to try to trick them into thinking we live in Wisconsin or Michigan. Hope you all are coping with the heat wave!
Wallets or Purses — made of leather or fabric to hold notes and coins
I'm uncommonly disgusted and angry tonight.Probably due to a combination of unrelated but intrinsically linked incidents which culminated into one big time meltdown today.
COMPANY
Hi. It's been a while. I feel a little silly to even be writing this post, but I have some exceptionally wonderful readers and friends who have asked about the blog recently (and some not so recently) and I feel like I owe them/you some sort of explanation as to where the heck I've been for the last 6 months.
Hamill PV, Steinberger E, Levine RJ, Rodriguez-Rigau LJ, Lemeshow S, Avrunin JS. The epidemiologic assessment of male reproductive hazard from occupational exposure to TDA and DNT. J Occup Med 1982; 24: 985-993.
Élie Ducommun (February 19, 1833-December 7, 1906), Swiss journalist, eloquent lecturer, business executive, steadfast advocate of peace, was born in Geneva, the son of a clock maker whose original home was in Neuchâtel. Early in his boyhood he gave evidence of his capacity to make the most of his remarkable talent and intelligence by intense application.
Sexiness…reclaimed.
9:00 a.m. @ E.E. Bass Auditorium $5 per student, PreK-3rd Grade Students
Gani went on probably hoping that the public would be as gullible as he expects of them: “Therefore, in view of the circumstances at that particular time and in the interest of justice, peace and harmony, I decided not to press any charges against them.”
Usually, May is the month where my ‘dilly-dallying’ and ‘faffing about’ usually stops. I can no longer get by on the usual suspect excuse of ‘it’s still early in the year yet’ as my reasoning for having achieved little by the time May rolls around. The darkness of the winter months has long slide past the horizon, the gentle nudges of spring have at best retreated and it is face the music time – what is this year going to be all about and am I making any progress? What of my plans and goals?
I can hear the sound of the rising sun
If you don’t know where you want to work you’re obviously going to have to search for some options., but you’ll be looking for a needle in a haystack if you go to popular sites like Monster.com and Craigslist. That isn’t to say they won’t have a great job here and there, but you’ll find yourself wading through a lot of undesirable positions just to find the ones you want. Instead of going the traditional route, try an unconventional job site like OneDayOneJob.com, which sends opportunities to your email inbox every day. SimplyHired is a seemingly standard job search, but it aggregates listings directly from company web sites and other locations so you’re not just pulling directly from one big pool. TweetMyJobs will handle the searching for you. Just tell it what kind of job you want and it’ll text, tweet, and email options to you as they’re discovered. Even if you’re several years out of college, you may also want to look at any job listings provided to alumni. Even if overqualified for the jobs being offered, you’ll learn about companies that are friendly to graduates of your school. You can look on the company’s site for more suitable positions and apply for those.
Medical News Today
The book series is called Gumpchy the Little Baha'i Bear. Here are some of the characters from these books:
I don’t know the context in which the music is used… I never finished watching season one and I may have seen the relevant episode already, but I can’t remember. It was about seven years ago now when it first aired. That being said, I like to imagine Commander Adama is giving his son Apollo a gift – a good lighter.
Contact us for added advice on asbestos claims.
Maybe the link lies in genius. Doctors are smart. They wouldn’t survive medical school and cure their patients if they weren’t. Could it be that people with bad handwriting are people who think so fast that their handwriting can’t catch up with their thoughts? Could it be that bad handwriting is a reflection of one’s mind, the kind that moves at the speedy pace of a badly written note? Could it be that I have bad handwriting because I’m smart? I can’t prove this theory, but I like it.
True Grit tells the story of 14-year-old Mattie Ross, circa 1875 Arkansas, who is set on avenging her father’s death at the hands of Tom Chaney, a hired hand. Mattie is a self assured, strong-willed young woman of Christian morals. She has a head for business and is unafraid to make judgments and see her decisions through to completion. When word of her father’s murder while on a business trip reaches home, there is no question that Mattie will take charge. She is the eldest child and her mother is too overcome to handle matters. Mattie travels to Fort Smith to see to her father’s body and his business deals (missing his funeral) and then sets down to getting justice. Frustrated by the slow response of law enforcement to her father’s murder, Mattie decides to hire someone to help her track down and kill Tom Chaney, who has fled into Indian Territory.
Clean.
I think about her voice and how I haven’t heard it for an eternity now. The scolding would be worth it. I think instead about what I could say, what could prompt her from her reverie. Silhouettes of her arms move in a jagged dance across nowhere space. The canvas wobbles in an uneven bass beat and enhances my trance-like state. It’s nice, but not perfect.
Check out the surgeon’s reputation
Ted believed with great conviction in the principle that what goes out must be replaced; the sooner the better. He would therefore commence drinking immediately.
Games I've played, but not finished
Steps to healing.
The addition of THREE tackles, Bobbie Massie from Mississippi being the stand out one, means the Cardinals have addressed a big need in a big way. Quarterback Ryan Lindley was taken in the 6th round and will apply some pressure to the faltering Kevin Kolb.
Are there any employees left to manage?
Being a force of nature doesn’t keep you safe.
Bottom left: The beautiful ornament I got from Jill through the ornament exchange. This is one of my favorite ornaments that hangs on our tree, absolutely beautiful!
Just when I was thinking "gee whiz, I haven't seen a Hooksett disc today, maybe they're gone," I saw a couple. They are going to be here forever. I'm still waiting for one to wash up on a beach in Europe. There's remarkably little trash on the beach, for which I am thankful to all the volunteers who participated in the cleanup, and all the people who are responsible about their trash. I did see a plastic cup embedded in the dune, tangled in the roots of the beach grass. I also found a plastic army man -- what is it with plastic army men on the beach? The plastic army man went into my pocket for future poetic or artistic use.
On that day in 1999, we got out of the car and walked around the chapel to the bridge over the clear stream of Commissioners Waters, where once I had seen two huge golden carp. Giant goldfish, they were.
1 accustomed
Since (Sun Xu) you are a scholar, you tell me.
I have also come to see that a writer mustn’t give up. Nobody ever got readers by not writing anything. I have three things that keep me going.
A 4-alarm fire at Tyler Perry’s studios in Atlanta, Georgia, burned incessantly Tuesday night into early Wednesday as more than 100 local firefighters were called to battle the blaze.
Without further adieu, here's our Super 6.
1 cup plain flour
We know that because the Racists once said that 'the Browns can do no good'. Simples. Eh?
Students that want to work specifically with organizations on their monetary activities can seek out education in a corporate finance degree. Investment banking, market directive, and cost analysis are subjects that train students to become financial reporters, fraud investigators, stockbrokers, and more. Online graduate degrees in corporate finance are taken as concentrations in finance programs. Other possible online degree programs can be pursued in finance and banking where students learn to work in financial institutions like credit unions and banks. Students can expect to learn about accounting principles, macroeconomics, and banking information systems inside a standard degree program.
Where Paperboy really shines, however, is in its presentation. As previously stated, there is a lot of humor in the game, both in its environments and characters. There are a lot of funny voice samples, particularly when you run into things. That charm is what really makes the game an enjoyable experience overall. It also has some catchy music with awesome percussion.
“You’ll probably see many Intel-based tablets by the end of this year,” Intel China chairman Sean Maloney said while speaking at the Intel Developer Forum in Beijing.
(Photo credit: Christian Petersen/Getty Images)
27 Are you engaged as a teacher or a tutor?
1/2 tsp cloves
I armed myself with lots of periodical inspiration but everything just seemed so damn expensive (especially when faced with a new mortgage). And the choices were once again, so daunting. So before you know it a month turns into 6 months which turn into a year and suddenly you've been living in a place for 3 years, all the while making excuses about "we just haven't gotten around to it".
World domination or death! Yes thank you!"
D – Audio frequency power amplifier
Floating Fortresses:
At that point in the speech there was some REALLY weak applause. I want to find the people who did applaud because I have some lovely bridges to sell them.
It's a romantic poem based on a Scandinavian legend about a merman who married a human woman and took her to his home beneath the waves. They had children, and were happy - until one day the woman heard the church bells calling people to prayer, and she began to fear that she would lose her immortal soul. She left her family for a visit to her old home - and never returned. Day after day the merman and his children rose in the waves and called to her. The merman even went to the churchyard and looked into the church and called again. But she did not respond. They had lost her.
So, despite its lack of flaws and perfect coloring, the typical woman does not want a Cubic Zirconia ring because it weighs too many toothpicks and can be broken with extraordinary force. Nor does she desire a manufactured diamond, even though it’s atomically identical to a natural stone. She understandably doesn’t like the fact that manufactured diamonds give off “different” fluorescent patterns when subjected to intense short-wave ultraviolet light.
Or whether on the sofa you,
Someone inside the corn crib was snoring. Ariela slipped the key into the lock and turned it gently. The lock clicked. It seemed to echo across the farm in the silence of the night. The snoring stopped momentarily and then continued at the same pace.
Pendragon is currently investigating misbehavior from a Riot employee, who by now may or may not be fired. “Misbehavior” is an understatement; complete and utter abuse of power on a catastrophic level is probably still an understatement.
1/4 t. baking soda
“Bierbrauerei" by M. Krandauer, 1914, page 301.
Oths KS, Dunn LL, Palmer NS. A prospective study of psychosocial job strain and birth outcomes. Epidemiology 2001; 12: 744-746.
Blue bulging eyes examine moves,
3 less
Dry, sarcastic, sixteen-year-old Cam Cooper has spent the last seven years in and out hospitals. The last thing she wants to do in the short life she has left is move 1,500 miles away to Promise, Maine - a place known for the miraculous events that occur there. But it's undeniable that strange things happen in Promise: everlasting sunsets; purple dandelions; flamingoes in the frigid Atlantic; an elusive boy named Asher; and finally, a mysterious envelope containing a list of things for Cam to do before she dies. As Cam checks each item off the list, she finally learns to believe - in love, in herself, and even in miracles.
On this particular splendid day, Dog quickly discovered a darling black Cocker Spaniel about his same size, at the end of a lease held by a robust, friendly-looking man.
I do not relish five years with Gordon Brown as leader. I do not relish five years with a Labour government which continues to erode civil liberties. I do not relish five years of a Labour government which permits 20,000 council workers to enter homes without a warrant.
The wife really enjoyed it, and got a good roasted dark ale flavour from it. I couldn't detect that under the citric punch: it's another one of those black IPAs I would swear is pale when drinking with my eyes closed. There's no doubt Raven is complex and interesting, but I just feel a bit abused by it. Too much of a workout for my weak and feeble palate.
The key to this recipe is to not overcook the tender cut of meat. The plank will help by retaining the moisture, but always use a meat thermometer. If you do not have enough backstrap to feed your crowd, this makes a nice appetizer and is a great introduction to plank cooked wild game.
“Help, master, help! Here’s a fish hangs in the net, like a poor man’s right in the law.” (Pericles, 2.1.153), Fisherman
Stud Cuff - £4 ish from International/Au Naturale (or whatever you call it!)
At the time I thought I'd come up with a pretty original demonstration. But later I found out that Alvin Lucier had done a similar demonstration ten years earlier. He obviously did not use synthesizers at that time but he did use biofeedback to control solenoid operated percussion instruments. And currently Tod Machover is pursuing mind-music connections in a similar vein but with much more sophisticated equipment. I also painted the cover art."
The trouble was, now he was very not-too-happy about this door that had been yet another traumatic experience for him. So he wouldn’t go near it. In my head I was thinking: that it cost me a fair whack of cash, little shit, and come hell or high water you are going to use it!! But I remembered that in my research one of the people on the website who reviewed this catflap admitted to having gone through a similar process with their cat and said to just be patient. That he would work it out for himself. So the waiting game began. After repeatedly looking up and seeing him sitting on one side of the door looking out, then running away from it, I just forgot about it. After all, lazy arse was still using the litterbox! I mean, why not use the warm pooper, right? Anyway, at some point, I was sitting on the couch watching TV and I heard the door swing open: he was going out! Eureka!! Success!! Phase 1 complete! But then Phase 2 started: is he going to be ok? What if he gets lost? What if he gets mauled by a raccoon? What if…etc etc etc. After a while I sat wondering whether I should go out and check on him, when I heard: click…pause…click…click…pause…click…and I realised he was trying to come back in but every time he started coming through the catflap, the button would release with a click, which in turn would make him freak out, which would make him back out of the catflap in a hurry. He’d take a moment to consider his chilly environment outside, and start the process again. This continued for some time until finally, almost as if in an act of desperation, he came barrelling through the door at mach 5, skidded into the kitchen, took a moment to compose himself, then came through to the lounge as cool as a cucumber. “Hey, Ma…that door…it’ll do.”
One thing I was in high school was skinny. Like people asked me all the time how I got so skinny. Best of all I still had relatively big boobs (hey wait, why was I not popular?). Now I have genuinely big boobs, but I'm about 20lbs over my senior year weight. So this reunion of sorts is at the end of August. That means that if I want to go (which I do, but I tend to get overwhelmed by social situations and flake at the last minute as I sit crying to my husband that I don't want to go) I really need to get on the weight loss thing. But I don't know if I will get to it or not. I mean just the idea of giving up my soda, chips, crackers, candy, and frozen desserts makes me sad.
Time for feet up and some Tube Time!
So, as I promised a few post ago, once I weighed under 200 pounds, I would post a picture. Don’t forget to go back to the beginning of this journey and read my very few updates and before pictures. I can’t close up this post without setting another goal for myself. I love goals, Don’t you? Okay, I am going to start doing 100 crunches aka half sit-ups every night, to help tighten my belly. Let’s do it together. I will update the picture when I get to 185 pounds.
Married: 9/29/1919 (during childbirth)
The tears of shame for what's been done,
He said the board was entitled to take the seriousness of the offence into account when considering placement on parole, otherwise it would make a mockery of the justice system.
Shoot for the Stars
They place upon your mind
My second project for this month's assignment for the Pages Design Team was a Blessings or Thanks Journal. The assignment was holiday party favors or decor and my supplies included the beautiful "Summer's End" collection by Fancy Pants Designs.
Guess what ugly arse horrible color our team is?
Eco-Tip™ welcomes your comments and suggestions. Our goal is to openly discuss environmental issues, to suggest actions that make our environment safer, and to show how our seemingly unimportant individual actions, when totaled-up nation-wide, actually do have an immense impact.
Also, there will be 21 balls of Studio Donegal Kilcarra Aran Tween coming available… free to a good home (see WIPDown above)!
984 **D-IX/18/1987. “Legislative Supremacy and ‘We the People’: On to Three Hundred.” Chicago Ridge High School, Chicago Ridge, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item 1991(2), above, pp. 1097-1109.)
Cholesterin – See Lanolin.
If you are still unsure whether you’re in a healthy relationship, our Healthy Relationships Quiz can help you.
A: … may mapapahiya
There actually was someone there sitting on the white lobby couch. It was an old lady who looked like she was trying disastrously hard to be a young lady. She must have been about eighty, wearing a red taffeta dress adorned with tiny pom poms and outlandish makeup smeared across her face. . . . and most disturbing of all, red lipstick that was half on her lips and half on her teeth. She sat there smiling broadly at me. Frozen, it seemed, or locked in time. . . .
Luck has never been in her favour
I was thrilled. Happy. Ecstatic, even.
1/2 cup grated fontina cheese
Who would have known with the evolution of technology business's worlds would be able to incorporate better, and faster business strategics and help business exceed its communication limits worldwide. But yes, we all know how communication is the most important part of a business and with business partners of languages how would trading partners be able to communicate? For this a translation for languages one cant speak or is unable to understand is needed, and on the web there are plenty of sites that will help you.
of children and possibly the best."
I am now one of those people who are blogging about a slimming journey. I’m sure you’re thrilled!
but these are just flat sandals. :(
Before the action in which Stockenstroom died he and Graham were scouring the countryside and looking for a place where they could establish a military base.
yeah, that deserves a post all of its own --
Monthly Organ Concert -7:30 pm -- Riviera Theatre
Say the words?
”We are grateful,” said the Japanese empress, three years old, and returned to her tea.
(2) Everyone agreed that the Federal Circuit (uncharacteristically) focused on factual issues in the case. The court normally bemoans appellants that rehash factual issues instead of arguing the law, so everyone was surprised that they spent so much time on the facts.
As monstrous and inhumane as the German war against the Jews was, to the German's credit (and perhaps because they had no choice) a significant majority of them at least acknowledged what happened, and do to this day.
It will happen. We need the COURAGE to keep believing in what we have to say, to keep charting trails we haven’t been to, to keep searching for people who can inspire us to live an authentic story as well.
“Are you Tanya?”
And so this concluded one of my final projects of my second year at university. Although I’m sure i’ll be keeping myself busy over the summer with various other projects I’ll be challenging myself to do. This was probably the most fun I’ve had whilst working on something at university. Just because you were so free to experiment and push your ideas far.
We encountered many sympatico souls that night. Connected again with Aaron Reid, the photographer who took the amazing shots of the winter concert – he came to the rally. Got to know Jim Hoggett, freelance photographer for the Beaver/Metroland chain. Nadiya’s mom took some absolutely incredible night shots. Then there were the two women to spoke to me outside the boardroom, asking when we were speaking. They were decidedly disappointed when I had to tell them we wouldn’t be.
Williams says there was an accident on the rig that has not been reported before. He says, four weeks before the explosion, the rig’s most vital piece of safety equipment was damaged.
By the way, how does the name Abelard sound for the FVH?
GUJRAT, Pakistan -- A New Jersey resident whose daughter and son-in-law were gunned down while on a trip to Pakistan was named as the chief suspect in their deaths. Muzaffar Hussain is suspected of murdering his New York native daughter Uzma Naurin, 30, and her husband, Saif Rehman, 31, in an "honor killing," the Daily Mail reported.
Yay! Sunday marks the sophmore installation of the Fashion Bloggers' Brunch. Seats are all booked but due to popular demand we'll be changing venues from October to accommodate more fabulous fashion bloggers. I wonder could we strike a deal where we take the Odessa french toast and Bloody Marys with us. Hmmm... There's a thought!
Plan B was in full swing, and with vouchers obtained for items three and four, the marshal left me to carry on and dispatched herself back to store one to attempt a second offensive toward the camcorder. As her corporal I valiantly sailed through my mission with colors flying, and then the call came in over our communicators. “They’re out. I got within five people of the wizard of camcorders when he announced not nobody - not nohow!”
NICE Guidelines
1430 ***D-VI/1/2002. “The Stories of Caliban.” Theatre Symposium on The Tempest, The Basic Program of Liberal Education for Adults, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Part B-10,)
I am sure there are more that are less than 4.5%, but I'm can't seem to remember any more. If you know of more that are below 4.5% that will be available on April 7th please leave a note.
One of her victims was 22 year old NTU student Ng Yong Cheng, a son of a doctor who lives in a luxurious condominium in Choa Chu Kang.
In the end, “Politics According to the Bible” is a mix bag of common sense, conservative values, and totalitarian ideals. Though written from a conservative perspective suggesting limited government, several of his religious convictions are allowed to seep into his political perspective and influence his decision in a totalitarian way. Even though he addresses where socialism and totalitarianism are wrong, he is not able to see where he crosses that line himself. This is another major problem we are facing today because the conservative side alleges that they are fighting for limited government, but in reality, they only want to limit it in certain areas. Many of their attacks on the liberal system can be made against them as well for different policies. This is obviously not something that Grudem addresses in the book. The two parties in the system are more alike than they are willing to admit.
Spring Awakening (Thea), Back to School Revue: Parte Deux (Really really talented and good looking actor)
No regrets
When Brenda realized that the death was the result of an urban legend, she decided to kill Natalie and her friends with re-enactments of those very legends. Now, I have to stop here to rant a little bit. Doesn't it just seem a little out of whack? I mean,yes Natalie was in the car, but Michelle was the driver, right? Wouldn't the story have made more sense if Brenda had saved Michelle for last instead of Natalie? And why kill all of the others on campus? None of them had any ties to the incident in any way. Seriously, is it just me, or is Brenda's plan filled with more holes than a chunk of Swiss cheese?
Cricut Kisses and Crafty Wishes!
New Holland Cabin Fever; Holland, Michigan, Brown Ale, 6% abv
And her screams were beginning to break down our very cores.
6. Basic Rocket Science: The episodes that wound up in my top 5 are in there because of deep emotional resonance and meaning, but “Basic Rocket Science” might actually be my choice for the single funniest episode of the season. A space movie parody laden with Kentucky Fried Chicken references and a butt flag? Sign me up.
Trees were planted, weeds cleared away where absolutely necessary, beds watered, beds prepared, all these people involved in their own space, with the sun and the smells shining on.
Now you may have heard about Meatless Mondays already. If you haven't, seriously what rock are you living under? Don't get me wrong, I blogged last week that I could never go vegan and struggle as a flexitarian, so it took a while for me to even pay this any attention. I thought it was just another abused trend that would soon enough die and be replaced with Truffle Tuesdays or Whoopie Pie Wednesday, but as my passion for all things "save the earth, the world, and myself" grew I decided to open my eyes and realized what a wonderful movement this is, second after Slow Food. All you have to do is use the power of choice. That's it! If you don't even have the energy to do that, its time you call Dr. Phil or something. Going meatless once a week, every week, will keep you looking slim and sexy since red meat contributes to obesity, and your heart will only break at the hands of boys since red meat also causes cancer and heart disease. The fresh water and fossil fuels you'll save will also get you on the shortlist for a Nobel Peace Prize. It's true. No not really, low carbon footprint is not yet a category, but I'll send you a cake in the mail for your goody two shoe ways.
So I feel like a monster sized turd right now. I’ve gotten very little accomplished today and the outlook for the handful of hours left, well…that’s looking just as grim. I think it’s necessary though, to feel like a mega-huge pile of dump every once in a while. It builds character. It lets you know that, this, what I’m doing today, is not an acceptable form of behavior, that if I were to continue down this path of idle apathy, I might actually turn into a non-metaphorical piece of actual shit.
The scene returns to the shots and cutting rhythms established before the teller walked away from the window. Once again, Manny's face is now mostly unobstructed. We can visually sense that our sympathies are to lie with him.
I went online to find out what was going on. It was true, a massive earthquake of 6.3 magnitude had struck with devastating results. You can imagine, a mother (me) sitting in a dark house, 11,750 miles (18,900km) from her daughter who is shaken to the bone. The frustration of not being able to reach her after the first message was beyond belief. My only consolation is that she said those last four words to me..."but I am fine". I had that much and she knew it would make all the difference to me.
“Okay then,” Ella says lightly. “Let’s finish our milk and then off to bed.”
AAM: No. Because our plan, and certainly the plan of love, is more about rehabilitation and being shown choices than punishment. (1) And so those shifts are already underway. They are already massively underway.
It’s not that anything MDS wrote is wrong, or anything, it’s just that even poor showings tend to come across with quite a different tone on major sites like MMA Fighting, Ben Fowlkes’ excellent comically-tinted pieces aside. So, MMA promoters, take this as a lesson — if you’re going to put on a bad show, by all means go for it, but at least have the decency to do so without making your viewers pay for the opportunity to be let down.
This is my social media solar system (a description coined by Blogher for the name of the conference session I spoke at during the Blogher/Creative Connection Event in St. Paul, MN last fall).
For now...you can stay connected to me by email....Facebook or heck....call me! :-)
The Grossglockner High Alpine Road is one of the most scenic drives in Austria. The highlight of the drive is to follow a division of the road to see the Pasterze Glacier (sad to see it is rapidly retreating) and the highest mountain in Austria – the Grossglockner at 3,798m. Because of snow, this section of the toll road is usually only open from early May to early November. Some facts from its offiical website:
“She likes chocolate best. Starts squirming like a fish if I so much as look at it.”
But the truth is, in order to really understand other people, other groups of people, their behaviors, their values, their ways of life, their reactions, one MUST take the time to place themselves in THEIR shoes. Otherwise, no real lasting respect or even peace is ever possible among diverse people. Let’s consider gay marriage in the US for instance. Only since gays have begun to come out and speak up has more families begun to realize that there were gays in their midst, a LOT of them. And when it starts to affect YOU, you acquire a newly-found perspective on the subject.
In addition, CarbFix is already showing results. Matter observed that the acidic solution is being neutralized underground, indicating that the rock-forming reaction is taking place. “If it’s mineralized within a human lifetime, then we know we are on a successful pathway,” he said. As the technology improves and the costs come down, Matter thinks sequestering carbon dioxide in basalt could become a viable strategy for controlling greenhouse gas emissions.
We have some of the clear and some of the brown vinyl. We did everything about this record with people we trust so the end price is a bit more than we hoped, but I think that you'll appreciate the album when you get it.
Join G-L by a curved line as shown.
These relational commitments rank the priority of practical commitments, and thereby assign other practical inferential commitments their respective motivational defeasors. They thus determine how it is correct to act relative to one’s circumstances. When such relational commitments are individual in scope, we simply call them preferences, but when they are collective (institutional or unconditional), we call them values (in the sense of ‘our community’s values’). Since they are one kind of collective practical inferential commitment, it is proper to say that values (in this sense) are a species of norm. We can then understand the values that things possess (as opposed to the values we are bound by), such as the cultural value of a painting, the monetary value of a coin, etc., as normative statuses that are conferred upon them by the roles they play within our norm (or value) governed practices. So, the fact that a painting is beautiful is to be cashed out in terms of certain norms governing how it is correct to act in relation to it, and the fact that it is more beautiful than another painting is to be cashed out in terms of how one should act in relation to both of them given the constraints supplied by ones circumstances. For example, if one is in a burning gallery, and only has time to save one painting, one should (by default) save the more beautiful of the two.
People like ourselves were just standing around, out of the way. The stokers, dining-room stewards, and some others of the crew were lined up, waiting for orders. The second- and third-class passengers were pouring up onto the deck from the stern, augmenting the already large crowd.
A post. I've been pretty sickly lately. And it's not very nice to be touching fabrics and fibers when sick, so not much has been accomplished. Yesterday and the day before, I was feeling a little better. So I worked on some more little earrings for my friend, since she just got her ears pierced a couple months ago.
Set shrimp aside to cool.
I knew then that I was in labour and decided I should probably shave my legs. Didn't want to scare off the doctors and nurses with hairy legs after all! I took a bath around 3:00 pm and barely felt anything as far as contractions went. Then..within a matter of minutes, I was suddenly in excruciating pain and we called my mom-in-law to come look after Connor. She lives an hour away though and there really was no time..or it felt like it so we called my friend Heather as well. She rushed over in the nick of time because we had decided to just take Connor with us to the hospital after I told Jeremy I needed to push!
Before bed, have a cup of chamomile tea; the plant it’s made from acts as a mild sedative, Breus explains, calming your body and helping you drift off.
The weather peeps have forecasted a “historic” snow event for the mid-Atlantic region this weekend just as we are on the tail end of 2 snow events since last Saturday. The cupboards are full of food and I have plenty of quilty projects to work on. So I’m ready to be snowed in this weekend…woohooo!
Was helping Middle Son with homework on Sunday evening. It was rather a dull task, with him finishing off a project about the Second World War, and me getting bossy about Fonts and Layout and Polishing It Up. Middle Son wanted to print the bugger out and go and watch X Factor. I wanted Posh Fonts, Smart Layout and Polishing It Up. As you do.
AMERICA
Now that I know for sure about NYC, I'm contemplating joining Kim for a crazy east coast double-header. She is registered & ticket bought for a Saturday half in NJ and Sunday half in DE in late October. It would be a blast of a girl's weekend. The only thing holding me back is...yes...the fact that I'm not running right now due to this damned plantar fasciitis. Should I do it anyway? What deadline should I set to decide, knowing that airfare is affordable right now and race registration could fill up...?
‘Mohamad Bakke has to pull the company out of the mess and refocus on its core strength which is in the palm oil plantations and its downstream processing business.’ The 56-year-old Mohamad Bakke is currently group president and chief executive of Felda Global Ventures Holdings, the commercial arm of Felda Group.
There are no “twelve” apostles in Galatians. That, too, is a later development. It appears that “orthodoxy”, as we read in Acts, sought to establish apostleship by contact with the human Jesus — apparently in contradiction against an earlier view of apostleship. Even on the orthodox view of apostleship James the brother of the Lord cannot have been an apostle because he never went with Jesus during his ministry. In Galatians James the brother of the Lord is an apostle like Paul — because he, too, has had the gospel revealed to him by God. In Acts this James is not one of the Twelve but is “managed” by the author by being made the one that directs the assembly of the Twelve and others at the Jerusalem conference.
And there are moments when she would like to apologize--at least for the way it ended."
“Yes…”
Recently I saw the images uploaded by Nithya from the blog named “fourth sense Samayal” on their Chennai blogger meet. She spoke to me two days ago and she was very much excited about the meeting. It was a small gathering for a mere observer, but it means a lot to the people who do it from heart.
He'd been on the hunt that morning, seeking a deer or perhaps an unguarded sheep or cow on which to munch as he made his way across the plains of Imphallion. He traveled mostly at night—even before Rebaine's campaign of terror, an ogre near any of the nation's cities or highways could expect a welcome carried on the fletching of arrows—but he'd thought himself far enough from civilization that he could risk a daylight excursion.
It may well be the case that this culture has its roots in Hinduism. If it does, this implies that Hinduism is the most misogynist religion and culture on Earth. Is this true? I am not aware of the misogynist nature of Hinduism or Hindu culture, but apparently it exists.
1. I’m a movie quoter. If you know what movie, “How ya doin little Tony?………….Bad” comes from, then you are someone I want to hang out with. My favorite quote is, “He is not the one, Steve.”
e. Provide one paragraph about yourself telling us about you and make sure your personality shines through.
Continuing on this blog are re-postings of my last year’s responses to the Writer Mama’s Back-to-School Giveaway prompts. My response for this year can be read on the Writer Mama blog: http://bit.ly/31zu3h
It takes a couple of listens to ascertain the hidden patterns that undulate underneath the abstract meanderings of brass and strings.
György Schwartz, better known to the world as George Soros, was born August 12, 1930 in Hungary . Soros’ father, Tivadar, was a fervent practitioner of the Esperanto language invented in 1887, and designed to be the first global language, free of any national identity. The Schwartz’s, who were non-practicing Jews, changed the family name to Soros, in order to facilitate assimilation into the Gentile population, as the Nazis spread into Hungary during the 1930s
These people dislike Catholicism because they’re psychologically biased by their non-Catholic genealogy. They may see themselves as open-minded people but longstanding biases, extending back for generations, discourage them from exploring the Catholic vision on its own terms, as it stands today.
Pepper powder- 1/2 tsp
When he got to the Bar and Grill he found the group being badgered about money by the host, and Arik was saying, “Well, you’re not going to kick me out, I can tell you!” and he noticed a nearby tablecloth was on fire, and several chairs broken. A patron he didn’t recognized shuffled past him with a limp and a black eye.
First up on the honey do list? The Bug's room....I've got some much much overdo projects for her nursery as we make the (VERY SLOW) transition to a big girl room (tear, tear, tear). I am a few steps ahead of myself here, but I am tackling some artwork that I want to hang, including some by the Bug herself, and I am painting a mini tea table for her since her newest fave activities are drawing and painting......next on the list is building some shelving for her (ever expanding) closet, and getting all of her clothes (NB-present) in Rubbermaids and organized by season and size.
Next mix together 2 c. warm water, 3/4 T. salt, 1/4 c. honey 1/4 c. oil, 2 c. whole wheat flour. Then add 1 more cup flour and yeast mixture and mix together. I always use my kitchenaid for breads now.
He's looking at it wrong. Publishers are not in business to "help" writers. They're in business primarily to sell books and make money... which, in turn, does help writers, but not in the way I suspect he means.
While I fiddled in facebook, and took on a new blog (actually it's not "new", just that I am now captain of the ship, so to speak), I allowed my mind to wander. Give it a break, because I had just been working on edits for the third book, and I think I was tired and needed a little fun time. (keys to the car, remember?)
Sorry about that. Got him chained to the radiator again now. On we go.**
11 So shall your poverty come on you like a prowler, And your need like an armed man.”
Since the NRO was enacted at the behest of Chaudhry Shujaat Hussain (PML-Q) and PPP as a major beneficiary alongside MQM & ANP; the black law would have easily sailed through both houses of the Parliament – the National Assembly & Senate – and given legal cover. PPP, MQM, ANP, PML-Q were the major beneficiary of NRO.
Humming King of the Road, Mom departed without the cheers, fanfare, and confetti she so rightly deserved.
Let me offer a little word of advice if you plan on heading to Wallace Station: Go hungry. And don’t plan on eating at any point for the rest of the day. Typically, I’m ready to eat every few hours (and by ‘ready’, I mean my stomach is growling and people are staring at me, wondering where that whale noise is coming from). After this brunch, I had to force myself to eat a tiny dinner, 8 hours later. Of course, this could have also been a side effect of the cold medicine that also left us dehydrated and nauseous. Even so, the food was good and was filling enough to last a long time. We’ll have to try out their lunch menu sometime soon! They had a beercheese burger special that sounded incredible!
This doesn't mean I will never write sf/f again (I still nibble at those stories regularly), but it does mean that sf/f isn't at the top of my writing priorities list. Contemporary is at the top. I have two YA contemp novels in progress right now. My goal is to have both of those complete by the end of this year, because I have two more already begging to be written that I first thought up a year ago. And I'm sure by this time next year, more new contemp YA novel ideas will be vying for my attention.
My rant is running out of steam because I'm just flabergasted and annoyed by this so much that I can't think straight. I'm not denying that there are copyrights and patents that are important, I just think this is an overreaction on the part of people with more money and power than I could ever dream of having.
This is the shot I managed to take as it started to move.
(Images courtesy of the Criterion Collection)
chocolates & clementines
Mass Market Paperback: 368 pages
“Yes sir. We have just received intelligence defining a clear and present danger to the United States of America, as well as the rest of the world.”
Ang trabaho ng mga macho dancer ay magbigay ng panandaliang aliw (The job of an MD is to provide temporary joy). That being said, having a regular MD is not the alternative to having a monogamous committed relationship. The gay bar is all about providing a mirage. The images are not real. The MDs are not really as happy as they try to seem to be. The sweetness they show the guest is (often) artificial. Do you even know the real name of your regular? Does he know yours? Hell, even the ages they provide guests are a bunch of (obvious) lies!
We can compare our bench end with another one from the collection of the Victoria and Albert Museum in London (above), which also seems to come from Devon or Cornwall, dating 1500-1520, by an unknown artist. The Victoria and Albert Museum website dedicated to it suggests that the motifs on the shields also refer to the Passion, but this time they were identified as the instruments of the Passion through the inclusion of what looks like a book or wrist-gard, which indicates that they may have been the craftsman’s trade symbols.
But that aside, we've being having a lot of fun getting to know people here. Last night I was up until past 2 talking about accents. They would try to speak "American" and make me speak "English." At any given time this is a perfect conversation starter. I'm slowly getting better at discerning who is from what area of England (one day I made the mistake of saying that their accents all sounded the same to me and ever since then I've been working on listening). After all, I wouldn't want to see like just another....American.
Keep it simple...
The new header is cleaner and has a "tag line" to share what me and this blog are really all about! Family, Home & Life!
It is Midnight again
touching life and deeply alive.
I want to Start Over
Had passed,
Synopsis from Goodreads
The men of Gibeon sent to Joshua at the camp at Gilgal, saying, “Do not forsake your servants; come up to us quickly, save us and help us, for all the kings of the Amorites who dwell in the mountains have gathered together against us.”
I’m inspired by my teens in the musicals, the ones who have to sing but contract laryngitis two days before opening night. They continue to rehearse what they can. And suck lemons and drink insane quantities of tea and honey so that the show can go on.
Indradyumna said, “O the best puruSa, by our grace, I have received that unique knowledge of the brahman, free from doubts which gives the ultimate joy. Now tell me O jaganmaya, yogEs’a, what should I do? I salute you O Bhagvaan Vasudeva!”
This is an urban fantasy, who-done-it mystery with a dash of romance. The story is laced with folklore, and at first — because I was reading so quickly — I didn’t understand how the role of Graveminder or Undertaker is passed along, so read the first chapters carefully. The most interesting parts of the story occur when Marr takes us into the world of Dr. D. How he and the rest of the dead are connected to the world of the living is fascinating, and she hasn’t revealed all that much in this first book — but there’s enough to make you wonder what she’ll do in the next installment.
The lavender cookie was a recipe adapted from Angie's Recipes. I find that there are not many lavender cookie recipes around online and I can't find a single one in my recipe books. I'd wanted to give a go at Happy Homebaker's lemon lavender shortbread but when I read how she described the dough as rather unmanageable, I thought I had better err on the save side by googling for a more full proof recipe, hence eventually I settled for Angie's lavender cookies. I did not make much modifications to her recipe except that I had used butter instead of margarine, reduced the sugar slightly and I made it smaller. As I did not press the cookie flat enough, the first batch that came out was a little soft, some did not have the "crunch" you'd want in a cookie. So I had to send to the oven to bake for another 3-4 minutes.
The Maryland Judiciary is demanding that we hold these dogs to a higher standard than we hold most humans. If a dog is teased, assaulted, attempting to protect its owner, any resulting bite will still be the responsibility of the owner. Yes, that means a criminal can sue the victim.
The second question is:”Once a charter city succeeds, is the experience applicable to other underdeveloped regions?” China’s SEZs could be replicated because the Chinese government at local levels are similar to each other (relics from the three departments six ministries system 三省六部制度 in ancient time and decentralization of power in modern time). China itself is like a huge laboratory. But few other countries share these characteristics with China. The basic administrative organs are pre-existing before any kind of charter is built and they can be destructive to the functioning of a charter city. How to coordinate a balance between the new rules and the existing ones will be a great challenge for charter city program.
Inside Scientology: the Story of America’s Most Secretive Religion by Janet Reitman – Reitman became interested in the Church of Scientology while writing a 2005 article for Rolling Stone. During her research, she discovered that no one had written a comprehensive history of the religion so she set out to do so in an impartial, journalistic manner. Far from being dry, this book provides knowledge and insight into a movement that is often dismissed or discounted. Recommended by Laura K.
If only I was as smart! I kept ‘trying again’ with the man I mention above. Hope is a powerful thing and my hope that Mr. Hot/Cold and I might end up happy together, despite tremendous evidence to the contrary kept overruling all common sense. I rode my rollercoaster-from-hell for two years. One day I was desperately wanted, the next I was ignored – on and on it went and I, stupid b*tch that I am, kept going back for more. Finally, we had a huge fight during which I expressed what had become incredible anger about our relationship. He responded with ice cold disdain, saying he had never promised me anything and that I needed to stop bothering him with my pesky, unwelcome emotions.
Here’s the problem, these machines are sooooo expensive. Like $500 expensive. It just seems like an awful lot of dough to make dough. The machine that burned was a Walmart Kitchenaid basic model that my lovely German friend left me when she moved back (something about a plug issue). It’s more reasonably priced at around $250 but I don’t think it was meant for mixing dough. Not enough power and I am not dumb enough to try that again.
True to the Gundam formula, Wing is ripe with political commentary and machinations. It’s a little difficult to follow due to the independent nature of the Gundam pilots; they often find themselves on missions with different objectives, forcing episodes to hop back and forth from pilot to pilot to advance the plot. The climax, however, is when the branches begin to fold back in, resulting in explosive battles at breakneck speed.
13. What do you wish you’d done less of?
A word quickly about caffeine. It is not specifically mentioned in the Word of Wisdom and is considered a grey area for many. For me, I’ve made the choice not to consume caffeine in accordance to the Word of Wisdom because for me, caffeine is an addictive substance that has harmful effects on my body. It causes my heart to race, my hands to shake, headaches, and increases the effects of anxiety. As stated by President Boyd K Packer:
Thanks Melissa for being such a wonderful Aunt to Deacon and a wonderful pseudo-aunt to James!!!
“This going to work out better than last time?”
Mountain Goats) classical piano player John Orfe (from Alarm Will
And then we made a lung! It was SO much fun! A must-do if you are planning on teaching your child about the respiratory system. I followed the steps found here and it worked perfectly. A great visual of the trachea, lungs, and diaphragm. And how the diaphragm contracts during the breathing process. Boo was able to see that the diaphragm goes down to create room for the lungs as they expand.
I turned 26 on the 12th. I’ve been busy trying to upgrade my internet and I’ve put in applications all over town. I’ve applied at several restaurants ranging from subs to fine dining, an art supply shop, a copy shop and a gas station.I thought I would share a few photos I missed posting in all the excitement…
Do you think that this scene looks warm or cold? Why?
I did like the author’s direct and conversational style, but I believe I would have enjoyed this book more had there been more of a reference to DOGS. For me, the title Dog Sense led me to believe the dogs in the book would play a larger role. I felt their appearance in the book was rather weak. I would have enjoyed reading less about the bullying of Guy by Brad, and would have enjoyed reading MORE about the impact their respective dogs had on their life.
'Why,' I asked a ploughman in Norfolk, do you drink your beer from a tankard?' 'Because it tastes better that way,' he replied instantly. But he was unable to say why beer should taste better when drunk from a metal container than when drunk from a glass.
Thank you, Sonja, for your example to me of a wonderful mother. I want my home to feel like yours does and pray that my children will be as happy and comfortable in their own skin as yours clearly are.
24. To remove burnt food from the grill, sprinkle with baking soda, then soak. After several hours, the charred pieces will come loose easily.
The weaker-than-expected Existing Home Sales data is the third such housing report this month to suggest a lull in the spring housing market. Earlier this week, homebuilder confidence slipped for the first time in three months and March Single-Family Housing Starts fell, too.
Cluster into next dc(sc)
Dear Lindsay,
“When Jesus came to Golgotha they hanged Him on a tree,
The key message from the above passages is the passion we need to have for one another in Christ. Paul was a people person even though there was some thing that was a bit of embarrassment for his listeners. He had an ailment and probably a question he had to endure from his listeners “You heal others, why not heal yourself”. The people at Galatia however could see beyond his trials and accept him to the extend that they could have gouged their eyes and given to him (implying his ailment was in his eyes?).
She has had all her blood work completed and has been to the dentist. She was great at the appointments, too. No crying, no screaming, and did whatever needed to be done. Her teeth are in great shape with the exception of some small decay between her front two teeth.
This morning the sun has deserted us again and its starting to cloud over and rain, nice while it lasted, hope to see you again soon Mr Sunshine.
And a nap with nobody but me.
Therefore for Revolutionary purposes I will let me beard grow, at least to the level of stubble possessed in the famous picture of him that’s all over those T-Shirts.
January in Ohio is no fun either. The days are gray, and even when the air isn't frigid, there's a bite in the wind. We've pretty much avoided (as if we had anything to do with it!) snow so far this winter, but that's supposed to change soon. I can only hope that the new tires on my Focus help it handle a little more deftly than a toboggan, which is what it was like driving in snow last year.
Husband's school won an award! A big one--his building is one of 4 in the nation named a School of Promise by the Milken Foundation. They had no advance warning and no hints this was going to happen, so it was pretty dramatic. I had a feeling this was going to happen, and not just because I am married to an amazing man who happens to be an amazing administrator. I knew it because the work begin done at that school is impressive. When they announced the name of the school (the first one announced--yee haw!), I jumped to my feet along with the rest of the group from our district, screaming and cheering and clapping. But a small part of me wanted to holler, "I told you so!"
Buzzin Fly – Tim Buckley – Happy Sad (1969)
I was left speechless,
This flexibility proved vital to my family’s survival when, two years into this proud display of my writing’s worth, Ron committed suicide.
Lawyer Gloria Allred is dug in. She is not going to let the octuplets go home with mother. It’s quite relieving.
the fact that I am real, not some ghost."
I figured that each quilt that I did myself was saving $50ish dollars, so each one I do myself I am subtracting from the price of my sewing machine. So as soon as I do 20 quilts, my machine is paid off. You all get the justification right? Please tell me I am not the only one who does this. So now I need to go out and buy yards and yards of fabric, to make 20 quilts, to free motion quilt myself, to pay off my machine. Right?
The Faction less seem to have banded together to form a much larger unity then any of the other factions. Within their group they have people who were part of all factions which includes Divergent, therefore making them stronger than any existing faction. Tris has an off feeling about Evelyn, the entire situation of them trying to get Dauntless and the Faction less together to overtake Erudite doesn't sit well with her. They move on back to their Dauntless headquarters as the traitors are at Erudite and no one is at Dauntless. This is decided while they were staying at the Candor headquarter - this is where the Dauntless retreated to after the first fight simulation. Tobias is now one of the Dauntless leaders, something Tris believes he always wanted.
I've also tackled most of the lounge room, and most of the bedrooms. Above are some pics of my bedroom after I'd done some spring cleaning in there. It feels so relaxing, peaceful and calm in there now, which is exactly what I wanted out of a bedroom, especially with having the baby rooming in with us at the moment.
Well, it’s like that for a lot of women. It is. Do men know about this power?
Zenith Virago is a celebrant, consultant, educator, facilitator, speaker and author who has been working in Byron Bay and beyond for over fifteen years. As a celebrant, she offers support for weddings and commitment ceremonies, and consults on natural and holistic approaches to dying, death and funerals.
Anyway, so far, 3 hours of training, so good. Another 30 or 35 hours to go. I'll post updates as I fly.
They are (from left to right) -
From a cultural standpoint, there are several things wrong. First of all, grown men didn’t run back then. At least not respectable ones. Second, the right thing to do would be to disown the son and have a funeral and consider him dead.
“MacBook Pro’s designers have worked tirelessly on its beautiful new look, and you can tell. And others can, too.”
For some variation, you could add 2 cloves chopped garlic to this, ½ cup grated cheese (Parmesan would be my pick, included in the layers), or 1/4 cup milk to boost the creaminess. You could also drizzle with melted butter instead of olive oil for a deeper flavor.
To see all the great justRite Projects that you might have missed on the web ---by visiting the JustRite shared Google Reader. Now located at the top right hand side bar of our blog.
My immediate family has Big Plans for 2012! All these plans are in full swing, and that's kept my from blogging, since I've been busy. I can't wait any longer to tell you of all the excitement!
So that is the tale about me and writing and the reason the teacher’s take everything I say with a pinch of salt.
This is the first pocket page that holds Maggie's card from Austria.
I used this in my poetry portfolio, mam is just back from work so i feel hopefull of a cup of tea and a toastie in the style of a pizza ( ham cheese and cherry tomatoes) hope you relate / enjoy :
For today’s Photo of the Day, I’m sharing a slideshow to introduce you to the newest batch of Canadian Red Cross delegates. Delegates are highly trained professionals who are deployed internationally on behalf of the Canadian Red Cross.
in nature, other people, music, art.
But the next time I looked, the fly corpse had moved right to the edge of the shelf. There was no draught to shift it. The corpse was still there an hour later, I couldn't bear it any longer. I got rid of it.
COMBINE HONEY MUSTARD AND HORSERADISH. SPREAD SMALL AMOUNT ON ONE SIDE OF EACH SLICE OF THE BREAD. CREATE SANDWICH IN THE FOLLOWING ORDER: BREAD WITH SPREAD, CHEESE, PASTRAMI, CUCUMBER WITH ONION, MORE CHEESE, AND ANOTHER SLICE OF BREAD. BRUSH WITH OLIVE OIL. GRILL UNTIL CHEESE IS MELTED.
It's been a while since we've had a flash fiction contest, and I'm leaving town this weekend (although I hope not cause I'm a loser, and NOT destination Boring!) so it's time for a contest.
Was he aloof?
Hello there and Happy Wednesday to you! Anne Marie here and I wanted to announce the winner of our Top Talent Award for the "Recipe For Mom" challenge! We would all like to say a big thank you to everyone who joined us and played along. Without further delay, I would like to announce that our winner is:
Inaccurately, we say that musicians "write" music, when we mostly mean that they've come up with a tune, and a professional musician who can't write music is considered to be in some ways analogous to a famous writer - Hans Christian Anderson, Agatha Christie or WB Yeats, for instance - with dyslexia. I suspect that this is true largely because the western orchestral tradition relies on the ability to read music. So perhaps it's unsurprising that when Cutting was talking about it at the gig, his banter had a self-effacing quality.
And the queen took a trip with the czar.
Some film critics, however, like Leonard Maltin and Roger Ebert have said/written in their critiques that what they are saying is in fact their own opinions AND they encourage people to make up their own minds. These critics (and others) do know how to separate the filmmaker from the film. I mean, I’ve never heard or read Roger Ebert referring to Michael Bay as an unfeeling robot simply because he directed “Transformers” or Tim Burton as a dark and disturbing person simply because his movies have that tendency. Carefully constructed criticism though difficult, isn’t impossible and it should be attempted with at least as much vigor as one would attempt to, say, save one’s child from certain death; because that is what art is to an artist… Their child… Their creation… something through which their immortality may be realized, whether the creation be “good” or “bad”… in any reviewer’s OPINION.
I would have to be either very frightened or very bored.
His mom gave Charlie a quick hug. “I’m so happy, honey. So happy.”
Okay so we ate and drank way too much by the time the Derby began but we managed to get in the bets based on the Trend Sheet. Using the ROD Average formula, we placed some box trifectas and managed to bring in 1500 bucks. Using the ROD Pace formula we pulled in another 50. “What the hell”, you ask? I know, I know, it’s chump change but it just adds to the bankroll. Derby is gone, Preakness and Belmont is coming up and The WiseGuy and The Mayor are focusing on Hollywood and then onto Santa Anita and the Breeder’s Cup.
I packed up my stuff even more quickly, thankfully Tracey stayed on the phone with me, and I ran out the office to wait for her. Tracey and I do a stellar job as co-mommies. She totally gets me, and together she and I "talked" through the possibilities of it probably just being a "10" on the accident scale of 100. Head injuries bleed so much. I was too afraid to talk directly to Erin (and hear Logan), but there had been no mention of him being unconscious or throwing up. My kids are at the stage where any sight of blood sends them into fits - they think they are going to die. So, right away, I knew Erin had her hands full with 4 boys, and at least one, if not more of them, screaming their heads off. Believe me, there are many days I want to call 911 myself!
8.Hay Maker (produced By Fatz Feat- Connie Diamond)
And 'round here, Mickey, all anyone's been talking 'bout
Yesterday, when I stumbled out to the kitchen in my fuzzy white bathrobe for a cup of goodness called coffee, I saw on the table, not one but FOUR homemade Valentines! Were there a couple of pun cards? You bet. My Valentine card to him had to do with porcupines and stuck on you….. I included a package of super glue of course.
Before I introduce you all to this months challenge, I do have an announcement.
That’s why I’ve written this book. I am on a journey. But I am convinced it is not just a journey for pastors. I am convinced these questions are critical for the larger community of faith in our country today. I am convinced that we as Christ followers in American churches have embraced values and ideas that are not only unbiblical, but that actually contradict the gospel we claim to believe. And I am convinced we have a choice.
46" of trim (optional)
Citation 2 is from the alphagalileo.org article I linked to above, while 3 is from one of Thomas’ own articles, which is surprising as it seems to be related to Junk DNA, a common subject in the ID community at the moment, for some reason. There are therefore plenty of better places to cite for this important statement.
R6- (sc in 3sc, 2sc in each) around (15) sl st to join.
I'm from South Korea and live in a small town near Seoul. I've been playing guitar in clubs since 1997. My name is Sangsu Augh in Korean, but I want to be called "Dringe" in my music career. It means that Dringe is a kind of borderline between 'as musician' and 'as a person'.
Someone who has read a preview copy of Neptune’s Angel has let me know that, “I did enjoy it and after thinking about it (it stayed with me) I am enjoying it more and more.”
Yesterday I received my contract report from The Society of Authors (who, incidentally, are lovely and incredibly prompt to respond). Obviously, what I wanted them to tell me was that my contract was gold dust and I should sign it immediately and begin my career as a well-respected author.
Add roasted vegetables at the very end. Stir and allow to simmer and heat for a few minutes before serving. Be sure to check seasoning! Add more broth if necessary to increase liquid amount.
3. I was ostensibly moving from one part of Canada (Winnipeg) to another (Toronto) but had elected to drive through the United States and spend the night in Chicago.
If you could convey to people just one simple thing that makes true freedom better than the alternative — one little thing that even a child could understand — what would it be?
It was very busy so we don't really remember it. We did the whole thing live in a few hours and then spent most of our studio time beating out rhythms on old cars and steel pipes in a garage next door. It was for a song called "Dj Fool" which was supposed to be the big hitter on "Dr. Phil" but mysteriously it didn't end up on the album and none of us remembers anything about the song or how it went.
Thanks to all the talk of me being a coward for not taking my bipping like "a man", I decided it was time to open the mysterious and suspicious package sent to me by GCRL. Since he has already revealed that my suspicions were correct about this package, me opening it is the equivalent of throwing yourself on a live grenade. The combat analogy brings up a good point in my defense against those branding me as "not a man". If this were 1968, and trading was 'Nam, and bipping season were the Tet Offensive, am I really a coward for not walking head-on into an ambush?
Paper - Dotty for You, White Daisy cardstock
*FURTHER ETA: I'm happy to discuss this in comments, but please do read my replies to previous comments to see if I've already answered your question/ clarified. This applies to most every question about whether this post is about blog reviews being inferior to pro (paid) reviews (it's not), whether it's about me believing negative reviews are bad (it's not), whether it's about me thinking book reviews shouldn't have an opinion in them (it's not), whether it's about me questioning the validity of anything that cannot be called a review in the strictest sense (it's not). I'm not impressed by folks turning this post into me being negative about the blogosphere. Like I said, I'm happy to discuss, but please read the post in the spirit it was intended and then read the comments. Thanks.
This San Diego girl appreciates one of your warmest winters ever (even if you did snow last night), if you keep this up, I would maybe, slightly, a little bit, but probably still not consider settling down here :) haha
A correspondent has sent me an intriguing news story about an elderly Indian woman who goes around the world hugging people. Amma, the Divine Mother, offers her open-armed blessing to all who queue to meet her. On a good day she can deliver 200 hugs per hour, which is quicker than a cattle rancher can geld and brand his herd. My females hooted with laughter when I told them about her.
Level 3 spinning class. 45 Minutes. Worked really hard in this class, much harder than normal I felt anyway!
day four.
While sitting at your desk make clockwise circles with your right foot. (go ahead no one will see you) While doing this, draw the number “6″ in the air with your right hand.
Winner will be announced Sunday 5th June.
In the last few post we have been talking about Jacob and his encounter with God. Jacob in his encounter with God wrestled with God and it changed everything for him. It changed the direction of his life and even changed his name. In this post we will continue to look at Jacob and again if you are unfamiliar with him please read Genesis 31 and 32 – if you wish you can click here to read it. The minimum I think you should know about his encounter is in this paraphrase of the Scripture of Jacob wrestling with God:
Al Jazeera’s reports ‘also tampered with’ by Astro!
As dusk fell ( and it got colder!) we retired to the warmth of the pub barn and Peter read a story he'd written. His melodious voice carried in to the rapt audience. Mesmerising. He said it could be taken as a metaphor, a story, or just something to enjoy. It was all those things and more. A privilege to hear.
So we all stood. We all stood up for Bersih – a clean and fair election in mind.
Assistant Commissioner of Police
Of course, as Marion Jones discovered, when chasing a dream as lofty as four gold medals, there are some things that are out of one’s control – the relays. And in Bolt’s case half of the desired four gold will be dependent on his teammates. The 4x1 has proven to be a gold mine for Jamaica in the last three majors – in part because they have run very fast, but also in part because of failure on the part of U.S. squads. The lesson here being that just as U.S. squads have come away empty handed due to not getting that stick around the track, the potential is always there. The Jamaican women found this out in Beijing when they took to the track a heavy favorite with the U.S. women having left the baton on the track, when they too failed to finish in the final and watched inferior teams pick up the hardware. Speed is important, but the 4x1 is ultimately about moving the stick. By the way, the last time that the U.S. squad got the stick around the track they won gold ahead of Jamaica – who had both Asafa Powell and Usain Bolt!
My boyfriend doesn't like them at all, and started a bit of a debate with me. Now I'm not sure about them.
There are many windows Manchester companies available which can be easily found in the Manchester city which promises you to strict European standards and also has proficiency in providing guarantees against default on windows, cracking and discoloration. These companies even assure you for sealing against drafts and water yields. Bonus advantage that customers get purchasing this is the beautiful sidelines.
When you see a cute pair of shoes that you haven't worn forever in your closet.....LEAVE THEM THERE!!! They DO NOT belong on your feet! They DO NOT belong anywhere near you! There is a reason you haven't worn them in forever! My feet hate me today!
2 simpler
Throughout the last year I’ve been thinking a lot about inheritance. Not inheriting things, like grandfather clocks and money or blond hair and small feet. I’ve been thinking about all of the intangible things we inherit from our parents and grandparents. Like patterns of dysfunction, and depression. Like fears of motherhood or a need to keep up with the Joneses. What’s on my mind tonight is depression.
Reporting:
Oh yes, before we forget. There was this attempt to nail him as an ultra-Malay racist. But that too died down into oblivion when the contenders discovered that even the DAP leadership was backing him as much as PAS.
When my mom was trying to teach me how to be independent, she started refusing to do things for me. I would ask her to make me milk (I know how to do it, but for some sort of reason the milk is better if she makes it), heat me some food, get me some plates, etc. So instead of saying “Ma can you make me milk?” which she will respond to with a “No, go make one yourself.” I started saying “I think I want milk.” Automatically she would get up and make one for me, forgetting that this was a request that she no longer entertained. After a while she realized that this wasn’t working, so she decided to ship me to America, so I’ll never get to ask her to do something for a long time. I know by writing about this my mom will read my blog, and she will realize that I have been duping her for a long time, and this technique will no longer work. Oh well.
born: 1700 (Kent County, VA)
Then apples again: Akane, HoneyCrisp,
But rather what you gave away to succor the distressed, for what you gave with charity, for that you will be blessed.
A man can’t have a friend if he, himself can’t be one. A man who has friends must himself be friendly. -Proverbs 18:24
Hello! I'm Jessie and I blog over at Our Adventures in Parenthood. The blog has become my main source of memory keeping and keeping family up to date. Mainly what you'll find is recaps of our weekends (I live for the weekends these days), lots of pictures, some milestones, some recipes and some random thoughts from me. I'm a full-time working mom of 2 little ones, Brody is 4 and Madelyn is 2. I'm married to my high school sweetheart, Heath. We've been together for over 11 years and married for almost 7! Here is a peek into our day!
This is my annual picture of what the front garden looks like but I promise this is not a recycled photo; it took it on Saturday .
“Moses is an obvious Biblical example. In Welsh tradition two of our greatest warriors similarly disappear: King Arthur and Owain Glyndwr.
6. To meet new friends & just relax. I don't know about you but I love visiting some sites which have nothing to do with writing. I might not have found them if I weren't blogging in the first place. They are fun, informative and often bring a smile to my face. A special blogger I want to mention here is Dezzy at Hollywood Spy whose site keeps me up to date on all the happenings in the film world.
Mash hops: Chinook
Of course, I assume anytime I want to use a client’s words, I’ll need to ask their permission as well.
The absolute best sponges to use are those very soft mushy ones that come in packages of 6 at the dollar store. They’re soft (much too soft for dishes) and are very fluffy making them perfect for your delicate eggs. Use them and when they fall apart (which they will) grab a new one.
If you’re not a geek, you might not be familiar with Wil Wheaton as a name. If you’re truly not a geek, you may remember him better as the boy in Stand By Me. If you’re slightly geekish, then the boy on Star Trek The Next Generation. He’s also made appearances on Big Bang Theory as evil Wil Wheaton, basically himself but evvviiiil. So not as himself really. He’s also written several books, but if you’ve read them then I suspect you don’t need me to explain who he is. Anyways, he performed/read several of his blog posts that were selected by popular vote and then opened up for a Q&A session. It was a great experience and frankly, nearly made it worth attending the con just for itself.
She has a recital at the end of this month and I just cannot wait! I'm so excited!!! Don't worry - I'll video tape it!
There. I said it.
Ave Dive Hadriane Auguste!
Not the Scooby Do card Spencer would want !
Just when you start to enjoy yourself somewhere, your friends drag you on to the next location. This constant chase not to miss a thing, makes you miss everything.
I wonder what 2011 will bring. We can only do one day at a time. This is the year to renew my driver’s license. I’m thinking of having a glamor shot put on my license, so OK I lied about my weight, what the heck! I’m fooling myself, I don’t mind…..
This week we have a new sponsor and it's
Am now in a white sundress, with something approaching a tan, smelling the grill heating up, and thinking I'll probably watch some episodes of Mad Men later on.
“I think it’s more likely to be resolved than to turn into a political football, but you never can predict this stuff,” said Lieberthal, a senior fellow at the Brookings Institution.
Tap on your eyebrow just near your nose.
What is enough? I am struggling with this question today. Eleven years ago, I was teaching second grade. I finally had my dream class after a few years of very challenging classes. One day a few weeks into the school year, I saw a child walking the track with the Vice Principal. The little boy was screaming curse words at him and sobbing. That same day the VP came up to me and asked me to take the cursing child into my class. I had mixed feelings about it. The little boy was brought to my classroom so I could meet him. I looked at him, his beautiful blue eyes peeking out under a mop of tangled, dirty hair, and knew that he needed me. I never saw that angry boy that walked the track. M was smart, kind, and had a huge heart. I asked the man that I was dating at the time to be his mentor. He said “Sure!” I ended up marrying that man and we continued to be a part of M’s life. We took him on trips, advocated for him in the foster care system, and had him spend a holiday with us. It wasn’t enough… M is now 18. He has survived his mother getting killed, his father dying in prison, being abandoned by other family members more than once, the foster care system, getting adopted at14, and then getting kicked out soon as he turned 18. Two days ago, I received a message from the county jail saying that M had called. I have missed the phone call three times now. He must feel like we abandoned him. Could I have done more to save him from this childhood? I feel sick to my stomach that the answer could be, yes. I contacted the Sheriff and am trying to communicate with M. This is what I want him to know:
So to ask me now, at 33, to lean on someone else for anything I need, no, not without a fight and it’s in no way intentional. With some more time and perhaps some more healing, I may be able to get to a point where I feel like I can trust B and G implicitly.
Whatever creative way you can think of to booster the likelihood of a second term in office, please take bold steps like our Pres did for us today.
TJ Maxx knit top
And as the puppy ignored the opportunity to relieve herself outside on the grass and instead pooped on the floor right after I brought her back inside, I had to remember Possum's joy at meeting her new, cute, fluffy little pet.
I need a course in better photography. Anyway, this is the second of three thank you cards I need for the nursery workers at church on Sunday and the PTI sketch challenges are helping me get the job done. This is sketch four and although the lighting is terrible, I used for inspiration a photo I saw on pinterest of some gorgeous pink, gray and white cupcakes. This uses sketch four of the PTI day six challenge. Thanks for looking!
I hope this post reaches those of you who have subscribed to eduClaytion through WordPress and my old email subscription service. I am attempting to post to the OLD eduClaytion for a specific purpose.
While it has become traditional in the UK for the monarch to effectively rubber-stamp legislation, the power of veto still exists** – all that’s lacking is the will to use it.
the photo really helps, thanks soooooo much Kelly .
On the other side, the markets (while they are, as usual, being cannibals) clearly have no long-term interest in burning Europe to the ground. First up, the EU is a crucial market for them; and second of all – destroy everyone, and it won’t be a haircut they’re taking, it’ll be every last strand of hair falling out. As you may have gathered by now, much of the time when we say ‘the markets’, we still mean ‘the Americans’.
This story has several layers.
My first thought was, “Ouch! That was a little hard for greeting an old friend!” He had smacked the lady’s arm with the book as she was in the middle of un-zipping his mom’s backpack.
I sing softly to myself as I examine the produce. I pick up a plum, turning it over in my hand, giving it a gentle squeeze, testing its give. Nice and firm, no blemishes. I drop it into my bag.
We’ll need to listen to channels a while longer if we want to hear from the likes of Archangel Michael, Sanat Kumara, St. Germaine, and Ashtar. That’s their preferred way of communicating with us. (1)
It’s name means “Strong bread” , which refers to the generous amounts of spices such as clove and cinnamon as well as black pepper.
I decided to take my usual Architect’s approach and follow through on the more onerous option, which was @Clarabel’s. By following her logic I needed more yarn to complete another repeat and the edging, so- assuming my calculations indicated I had enought – I was less likely to run out of yarn in the process. If, at the end of the day, I can cast off and have a chunk of lace-weight left over… well, to paraphrase Dr. Phil: maybe I was right, but at least I can be happy.
One of my ultimate favorite recipes that I make is this chicken curry soup. I got this recipe from My Friend The Chef. I learned so much from her during my time in Middle of Nowhere, Missouri. I am so grateful to have met most of the ladies there, but her in particular.
Congo, a nation nearly 10 times the size of the UK, has just 1,400 miles of paved roads – less than a tenth of what existed at independence and not enough for even a single road from one side of the country to the other.
Could Christ’s appearances have been hallucinations?
I've never been much of a clothes horse, which I learned today has two definitions according to Merriam Webster. The first definition that I'm familiar with refers to a clothes horse as someone who is conspicuously dressed - or as I like to think, someone who's obsessed with clothing. The other type of clothes horse refers to the photo below.
Find quilting, craft and sewing exhibits from many companies at the festival, and participate in make-and-take workshops. Buy a ticket for one day and it's good for all three days. Take a look at the festival's program here.
Read with dust jacket or remove it?
Apple, at 63-64 (citations omitted). That reasoning may set a high standard for patentees seeking to enjoin the use of their patented inventions in complex electronic devices, which generally involve a myriad of technologies.
Album is by K & Co.
Me: Yeah dude, they're nice.
Things continue to be stressful at Christi’s job, and seem to be getting more so. I don’t think she can do this. It’s very sad and very disturbing. That’s all I’m going to say at this point, other than, all prayers to rectify this situation would be greatly appreciated. We thought this was the right decision. Unless something changes drastically very soon, it would appear we were very wrong.
Jolene x
For me?”
How long does it take
Yule, or Winter Solstice, is a celebration of the returning light.
Anyway, in the fast-paced and comically hyperactive information seeking world we live in today, the idea of having ‘every muscle rested’ is almost too good to be true. I have a distinct and powerful urge to crawl into bed with my finacée and try to find my first position and have every muscle rest at least 10 times daily. I do have a stressful job. But ever since I first heard the song I’ve always assumed that that line meant that they crawled into bed and found the first position that their bodies ever experienced, the first position when they emerged from a cluster of cells in their mothers’ womb. The idea is interesting, that all people want to revert to a time before their were cognizant, or at least that reverting to such a state relaxes you more than any drug ever could.
Royal Opera House, Covent Garden
How does one prepare for the journey? Proper training. My life the past 10 years has been anything but mundane. My training in Christ and The Word of God has kept me on the path. Oh, it’s been very ugly some days and I very much wanted to give up. What I had learned in my spiritual training helped me to endure. Proper training is what I had been lacking all of these years of attempting to run. I thought that I could go on my own ability and complete a race, never getting any further than .6. I always became discouraged and gave up. I always wondered why. Why can’t I do this? What is wrong with me? I know what it was now, I didn’t use my spiritual training in conjunction with physical training. God knows me personally and knows that this is what I needed to complete a running race. I could have easily ran another .1 yesterday to make it a 5K, a race I had always wanted to complete and never thought I would. In my mind, that goal is in the past and I’m pressing further. I’m going longer, deeper, stronger and in time, faster. I have turned the corner from walker to runner. I will be a race finisher.
I immediately bookmarked this site when Maria of Dreamy Whites blogged about it here last November. Kimberley Bell's line of linens and tweeds are "inspired by vintage and french fabrics and an eclectic mix of all the things I love."
The court heard the protesters were chanting “racist” songs.
6. My dad's happy fidgeting, turning his cup this way and that while he talks.
Being a complete neophyte to the genre, I am loathe to rate this novel, whether for its entertainment or literary value, believing that what I have written above must suffice for my response to this high quality work; however, it I were given no choice other than to summarize my response in a number or to take a bullet in the head—my ignorance be dammed—I surely would give this novel four stars (out of a possible five).
Fear—what a common feeling, yet how indescribable and indefinable. Try it real quick; try to define fear. Fear is an emotion, a feeling—and our inability to define it, to readily and immediately understand it should give us pause.
I found
Mapeleton Hills Park, Menifee
I apologize again for neglecting blogland. I promise to catch up as soon as I can!
Many people say that celebrities are not normal anymore when they become famous. Well, needless to say, that’s not true at all. Sure, some celebrities let the whole famous thing get to their heads, but most celebrities that I’m a huge fan of, don’t let being famous take over their lives.
April 21st/22nd:
No. I am not an aspiring writer. I am aspiring to be a published writer.
Thanks so much for stopping by and have a great weekend.
Reflection and connection to learning
What is so extraordinary about the letters in support of Gulen?
See, Ossetia would be part of Georgia again, and with Ossetians fled (or dead) no more problems!
And this year, they each fall on Saturday, May 5th. At Derby Day parties throughout the country, a galling number of execrable mint juleps will be downed (and sometimes hauled back into the light of day) and inordinate amounts of tequila will be shot into (and out of) the drinking pubic. May 6th might as well be I'm Never Drinking Tequila Again Day.
BLITZER: That’s a pretty grandiose idea.
So, here we are in Singapore. Of course the first thing we do is head out to look for food. (Actually, I lie. The first thing we do is sleep lots to recharge after the massive week that was). Already we've hit the food court at the shopping mall next door and the local nasi lemak joint. (Note : You will probably see a lot of posts featuring shopping malls because Singapore has a lot of them!).
“If you don’t get married within three years of graduation, you’ll end up single for life.” This is hyperbole, but Summer has a point. It’s tradition, sort of. We go from school straight to the Administration (our territory’s central government), and that’s where we are, for life. The social pool multiplies as graduates from the ten Academies enter, but that’s it, since we don’t marry outside of the Administration. As long as I’ve lived, the same people have lived in this sector of the American Northwest Territory (or ANT, as Summer and I call it). After the Administration, there’s no one new to meet.
There’s so much available at Marist that you can take advantage of. My number one piece of advice: GET INVOLVED; it’s never too late! During my years at Marist I enjoyed participating with Marist College Television. MCTV has wonderful facilities and opportunities for students interested in broadcasting! Even though it’s a small television station, having the opportunity to produce, write and edit my own stories for MCTV News was an amazing learning experience and the footage I acquired was a great bonus to my resume.
Here are my first results.
Somehow, almost without noticing it myself, I seem to have become one of those people. Those annoying people who show up at a dinner and won't eat half of the things on their plate because they either contain sugar, white flour, starch, dairy, or something passing itself as fruit but which is closer to a lump of sugar, just not as refined. Those irritating people who can comfortably talk about the benefits of vitex agnus castus as a dietary supplement for at least a good 20 minutes, and don't even get them started on superfoods. Those boring people who swear by a green concoction of wheatgrass, spinach, cucumber, avocado, and some alfalfa as the best snack ever. Those frightening people whose pee is always neon yellow from excess vitamin C and completely discussible with anyone, odor included.
When it (the small blue block in the middle) has come loose before, you know it has as it clicks in the shoe a bit and you can hear it. But I guess the noise of the other runners and crowd last weekend and total concentration on getting round, meant I had no chance to hear it, as it came off (and ended up towards the toes – maybe that’s why I didn’t run as fast as I had hoped… LOL).
As she clutches the mike with sweaty palms
I then made toppers for a little box I'd painted using the same powders and techniques.
Knowledge is a proportion of undetermined questions
DW: (crosstalk) Right. Now you said something that is very provocative.
I went to Adorama and asked for a lensbaby.
Competing in both markets is a bad idea, and it will eventually impact your premium line.
If this is the case, should we stop electing officials? Should we lose our faith to election?
Snow falling outside... (this wasn't my doing, but it was a lovely touch)
Fiction, Ages 4-8
Since moving up here to the Pacific Northwest, I have discovered many other wonderful places and destinations near by. I'd have to say, (and in fact, have said it so many times to my friends that they can finish my sentences about it)far and away my most favorite discovery since relocating up here has to be the incredible Birkenfeld Country Store, located in Birkenfeld, Oregon, population 12.
A safari is actually spent in a Land rover type car, with an open roof, and driving...lot's of driving...on the park's dirt roads in search of elusive animals and birds. But animal life is all around you, one can observe the social inter actions of the various type of animal. I could stare for hours and never tire of watching, feeling the hot dry air, listening to the sounds and birds singing.
16. Elis - Phoenix From The Ashes
Rod: 3.47
I'm on the phone with Randy right now. He's at Noodles Oodles waiting for you. Where are you? He has collected $3,500 from us and your colleagues to help you out and has my plane ticket for you. You're booked on United Airlines, flying London to Omaha via NYC tomorrow afternoon. Let's get you home for Christmas and put this whole disaster behind us! God bless!
In the upcoming weeks, I will be posting verses from Echoes. Within this volume of poetry are five chapters ‘intended’ to tap into your senses as you focus on the following:
Why? Doctors recommend to aim to lose between 1-2 lbs per week for not only safety reasons, but you’re more likely to KEEP it off. This is a much more manageable resolution!
Keep well...
This book has been in the making for a long time now. Over a half a year to write it, about the same amount of time to edit it, and probably about the same amount of time to get the art work and website! I have learned you can’t control the timelines of other people – Murphy likes to step in.
The following stories are of special interest for the specific detail which emerged in the telling.
So, there you have it, my hopes, dreams, goals, plans, and weaknesses on a silver platter – please treat them with care. But, it’s your turn now, tell me, what are your goals for this year? What new habits are you going to adopt that will make 2012 a year to remember? And how can we, your newfound support system help inspire you? Lets tap into the collective positive power of our fellow women and make this year our best yet.
Release Date: Wednesday, 16 May 2012
So hopefully the treatment will work! I need a break some where!
In Part 1 of this post, I left you with a flashback from my childhood. (Sounds like a sentence from a shrinks couch, doesn’t it?)
Pains, aches in joints, hands and feet
Q: What is special in 2012?
I live out here in one of the districts. I must remember not to fight the other districts, but to join together to fight the machine that wants to control us.
I do hope you like this new style of stepper – I had great fun trying it out and it was really very simple to make, so I hope you’ll give it a try too! If you do please link back to me and let me know how you get on. I’d love to see what you create.
I think I can safely say that I have entered the realm of maintaining the "Christian" facade and emerged on the other side with the realization that I don't have to be exactly like every other Christian. I've been there. So I also think I can safely say (from experience) that chasing after a lifestyle is empty. It's difficult. And at the end of the day you're left with memories of how you either managed to piece together enough of a good lifestyle to impress your fellow believers...or you're faced with how you failed.
Key - A potion or scroll is found on the characters next search attempt.
My only problem – I had dilly-dallied until the last minute, so chances were that the Kitty Tube would not arrive in time for Mom’s birthday, which was only a day away! Amazon only gave me one shipment option, so I went ahead and placed the order and expected a late arrival. But I noticed on the Kitty Tube business page that faster shipping was available to customers in certain states – including Illinois, where my Mom lives. I sent Kitty Tube an email asking about this delivery option (even though my order had already been placed). I went to bed in the wee hours of Thursday morning. By the time I woke up – Jim from Kitty Tube had already responded to my email, changed the shipper for Mom’s Kitty Tube, and refunded me $18 to reflect the difference between the shipping fees. To top it off, he wished my mom a Happy Birthday. How’s that for customer service?!
Don't forget to join our march for babies team.
Would you like to learn how easy it was to make?
COLSON WHITEHEAD (Zone One, Sag Harbor)
I’m still kinda new to blogging even though I have an IdeasTap blog, difference being that is sustained by them and I guess this is sustained by no one.
These are all grand, American institutions. Your claiming that basketball, college, Hawaii, California, New York City, Chicago, and Occidental, Columbia and Harvard are outside American culture is a slander to our entire nation and most of the people who live here.
The woman also tracked my periods and found out I was pregnant before I knew. Ummmm… yeah.
It was then Alice noticed a breeze, a breeze that flowed through her hair, around her neck and towards the creature. The monster breathed in deeply, a slow, wheezing breath and its white pupils seemed to bulge, its mouth to contract. This caused Alice to gag, and nearly be sick, but just as this happened the stag smashed through the undergrowth and landed with a clatter between Alice and the monster. Before then, Alice must have been rooted to spot with terror, unable to move due to sheer horror and repulsion. Whatever had been holding her lifted now with arrival of the stag and she found herself running, faster than she had been before, faster than she had all day, faster than she had ever run.
Would you come over already? I want to sit on the patio with a cool beverage. And play Catch Phrase. And grill out. Fine…no games. But we’re grilling.
Remarkably, the TSA has advised parents to instruct their children to regard strangers groping their private parts as a “game,” a practice also used by pedophiles and sexual predators. Children “don’t have the sophistication” to distinguish between a pat-down carried out by an airport security officer and an assault by a sexual predator, Ken Wooden, founder of Child Lures Prevention, told Raw Story in 2010.
2. We hope for He is good
have helped themselves to the endless supply
Chris' favorite card this week was Jen's card. "I love the pop of color on the white background. The two textures of the white, along with the lace border add to the elegance! So pretty!"
The standard procedure for removing heavy metals from the body is called “chelation.” It is accomplished by administering a chelating agent – usually dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) – that binds to the heavy metals in the body and cause them to be naturally flushed out. This type of treatment is quite strenuous, has many side-effects and should be undertaken only with medical supervision.
But clothespins? I love them. What a sweet and simple invention. Yes!?!?
I've been told that this is just the beginning.
He was the ultimate role model.
1099 ***D-II/9/1991. “The Poetry of Abraham Lincoln.” The Friends of Literature, Wedgwood Room, Marshall Fields, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-10, above, pp. 135-47, 297-300 (1999).)
— Joseph Campbell
Lots of bargains across the store - we need the room after all the new goodies we have been buying. Orders will start being despatched from Wednesday 3rd Feb.
Social interaction is further developed with the practice of custom, manners, etiquette, courtesy, protocol, decorum etc. Among the most prominent writers on North American etiquette are Letitia Baldrige, Judith Martin, Emily Post, Elizabeth Post, Peggy Post, Gertrude Pringle, and Amy Vanderbilt.
Peter Gabriel Games without frontiers UK
Adding to the surreal experience was the reason Harvey was showing that particular film that day. He’d invited the former Betty Marsh, since divorced from John and remarried, to see her one starring movie. As it turned out, she hadn’t seen it herself since about 1956 — there was no way she could have. So as strange as it was for me to be sitting next to a 60-ish woman watching her younger self and ex-husband on holiday, for her it must have been an overwhelming, time-tripping experience. She certainly marveled at what she saw.
I wanted to capture the essence of New Zealand.
As you can see the ink sprays were out along with sewing machine and some other bits and pieces to really make it look artsy fartsy.
And now to commemorate this magical number, here is the most special thing I could find that had to do with one hundred... 100 hours of that Nyan Cat.
I turned around and caught Anton watching me with a faint smile on his lips. It seemed to be mocking me. Stupid boy, he'll never love you either.
Here is the SSW sketch:
This seashell was on a wedding basket made by one of my best friends in the world; Jackie. Jackie died a few years ago and I still miss her terribly. The shell reminds me of her, how important friendship is and that you know, live your life with integrity and grace, you just never know when it will be taken away from you.
Hello and welcome to another week of Taylored Expressions sneak peeks! The Baker's Dozen is giving you a little preview of 3 new sets and coordinating dies today:
Here’s to having a plan… and following through with it.
I am absolutely thrilled to be nominated for an Annie Award for my work on Tigger in the feature film "Winnie the Pooh".
Then, this weekend we had guests! A missionary couple that moved into our area--just south of Mansa--decided to spend the weekend with us so we could exchange ideas and thoughts. It was a wonderful time, but also didn't leave me any time for blogging.
This is my Smoking Lily dress that I bought in Vancouver in March; it's called the "Emma" dress and it was $68.00. It felt like I was wearing pajamas all day! I wore a full-length navy vintage slip underneath this to keep the dress from clinging to the tights.
But you'll be hearing from me baby, long after I'm gone
2012-05-02.
But still – very cool and not what you’d expect in the middle of the city.
Today, we’re having one of those days where we don’t venture too far from home – tidying up (why does our house always look so messy after the weekend?), doing washing and just taking each hour as it comes. Grace and I have just made a new batch of play dough which is keeping her busy so while she’s happy sculpting ‘frogs and lily pads’, I’m off to calm down Sophie who I can hear protesting from her cot and then to hopefully make a dent in my chores for today.
We scream for warmth of human contact yet we’d rather text than talk. Isn’t it sad how we relegate humanity to the unfeeling circuitries of our tech inventions? Must modern man –this catalyst of past and future, science and faith — discard to desuetude the touchstones of his inspirations?
This is the third year for Pecan Cottage and if you haven’t experienced a getaway with our little Cottage as your home away from home then it is time you stop talking and start taking action.
* Enroll girls in school next year.
Doubt can help us test and examine our faith–to root out what doesn’t belong and nurture that connection to the I AM. If we think we know, we probably don’t know at all. Acceptance of doubt can keep us honest and authentically connected.
BLITZER: Go ahead, Governor.
Small drawing of a child (you can use a paper doll)
The notable changes in the proposed rule, as compared to the current Board rule, are:
Sierra Nevada Brewing Co. 30th Anniversary - Fritz And Ken's Ale
The day of filming was quite exciting. The Trinity Center, our multi-purpose building just across from the sorting building, was used for wardrobe, make-up and craft services. In addition to the actors and extras present for the scene filmed, actors Robert Duvall (Robert E. Lee) and Stephen Lang (Stonewall Jackson) visited the set. A surprise guest, Ted Turner, was also present during the shoot.
I am a collage artist. That we know. And collage requires vast quantities of source material - magazines and newspapers and photos and paper and found objects... and printing. Now that I'm working on large canvasses, there's a lot of printing going on, believe me.
I think we finally took off at 1954Z, that's 0124 local. India is +5.5 hour from GMT. Right?
However, I don’t think it’s as simple as going to your local church or Pastor and asking to follow him/her around like a lapdog. I think there is a big difference between becoming a replica or a shadow of someone else to becoming the person that God wants You to be.
CURSED proofs (basically early arc format) have landed at Spencer Hill Press and I can't tell you how excited I will be to hold this book in my hands. I wrote this book YEARS ago and it's been announced for darn near close to a year. So it's going to be super exciting for me and I thought in honor of the proofs arriving, here are the first 3 Chapters to CURSED. Enjoy!
time pensive;
Salt- 1/8 tsp
How frightening?
For leaders I think sometimes the people are looking to us to be somehow either exempt or unmoved. The Reality- It’s painful and I’m human (Amen)
You keep 100% of the control
But it did not happen. And I had to pay the fucking larcenous £1.70 to take a ride over 2.5miles, if that. Fuck you Translink Metro buses. I didn't even find change on yer seats or under em – not down the aisle nor stuck down the connects in the long back seat – and I only got on yer fucking rolling extortion wagon so that this might happen....Though, I have to say, when the kind lady didn't step off the bus that third time today to offer me her (free) all-day ticket, I felt my heart sink, knowing a treasure trove of silver & shrapnel did not await, knowing it intuitively – for the magic trinity had been prematurely snuffed.
I vaguely know another ‘white’ comedian who often plays ‘black’ clubs. I will not name the comedian because of what follows in this blog, but the comedian has talked to me of how he/she can tell jokes about black culture to highly appreciative black audiences. But he/she cannot tell the same jokes to white audiences because the jokes would be seen as appallingly racist.
To paraphrase Norm on Cheers: Attorneys. Can’t live with ‘em. Pass the beer nuts.
Pharmacies.
Music has the potential to either make or break the state of mind you’re in.
4)Leave a comment on the last blog of the hop on Thursday, revealing the secret word, and you may be one of 3 lucky winners to win $10 off their kit purchase!
Here’s what you need to get: this word ‘Afrobeats’ (or neologism) came into existence somewhere around April 2011, courtesy of one of the hottest DJing properties in the UK: DJ Abrantee. Guardian columnist Dan Hancox writes:
Jason Kidd has possession of 600-700 pages of text messages that include pictures from three to four of the prepaid phones, where his best friend was grooming his daughter from the age of fourteen to sixteen for the purpose of sexual abuse. In one of those messages, the perpetrator actually said how long his pursuit had been.
“Holding to account
Winter, Ruth. A Consumer’s Dictionary of Cosmetic Ingredients. New York: Crown Publishing Group, 1994.
Tuesday, April 17 is Equal Pay Day. This date is significant because it symbolizes how far women must work into 2012 to earn what men earned in 2011.
I'll leave you with this shot, which like my first photo, is a Yellow Jessimine ... the State Flower of South Carolina. While the first is a macro of the inside of the flower with the sun shining behind, here she is in all her glory basking in the sunbeams.
As weird as it sounds, I do not truly remember the exact moment I made the conscious decision to bring the boys home. I just remember that sometime over the course of that Easter weekend, I knew, in the deepest part of my being, that the boys were supposed to come home with me. That I was supposed to become their mother. That we were supposed to become a family.
Woohoo!!! Smoking hot Kareena. This movie was the first one where Kareena showcased her sensual side. Add Fardeen Khan to the mix, and Sonu Nigam along with Alisha Chinai providing the vocals, is it any wonder that this number is a chartbuster until this day?
trying to fly, really - to do something that's just not possible.
Copies of your Book despatched to the British Library & the other 5 Legal deposit Libraries
What’s your dream? What are you capable of achieving?
You may recall that they are the friends who stayed with us after the earthquake. They used some Timeshare points to get condos in Lake Tahoe and asked us --while we were still in Japan-- if we wanted to join them for Thanksgiving.
I love the calendar feature. Makes life way either. Now go on and comment about what you're going to see.
